Nevada, session 83, AB522.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 689A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 5, inclusive,
of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of health
insurance which provides coverage for dependent children shall
continue to make such coverage available for an adult child of an
insured until such child reaches 26 years of age.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 4 –
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring an
insurer to make coverage available for a dependent of an adult
child of an insured.
Sec. 3. 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of health
insurance shall include in the policy coverage for:
(a) Screening for anxiety for insureds who are at least 8 but
not more than 18 years of age;
(b) Assessments relating to height, weight, body mass index
and medical history for insureds who are less than 18 years of
age;
(c) Comprehensive and intensive behavioral interventions for
insureds who are at least 12 but not more than 18 years of age and
have a body mass index in the 95th percentile or greater for
persons of the same age and sex;
(d) The application of fluoride varnish to the primary teeth for
insureds who are less than 5 years of age;
(e) Oral fluoride supplements for insureds who are at least 6
months of age but less than 5 years of age and whose supply of
water is deficient in fluoride;
(f) Counseling and education pertaining to the minimization of
exposure to ultraviolet radiation for insureds who are less than 25
years of age and the parents or legal guardians of insureds who
are less than 18 years of age for the purpose of minimizing the
risk of skin cancer in those persons;
(g) Brief behavioral counseling and interventions to prevent
tobacco use for insureds who are less than 18 years of age; and
(h) At least one screening for the detection of amblyopia or the
risk factors of amblyopia for insureds who are at least 3 but not
more than 5 years of age.
2. An insurer must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider
of health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, an insurer
that offers or issues a policy of health insurance shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of
health insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of health insurance or cancel a
policy of health insurance solely because the person applying for
or covered by the policy uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 5 –
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of
this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy
or the renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, an insurer may use medical management techniques,
including, without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to
determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit
required by this section or the type of provider of health care to
use for such treatment.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of medical
care, including items and services paid for as medical care, are
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers of
health care under contract with the insurer. The term does not
include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 4. 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of health
insurance shall include in the policy coverage for:
(a) A daily dose of 0.4 to 0.8 milligrams of folic acid for
insureds who are pregnant or are planning on becoming
pregnant;
(b) A low dose of aspirin for the prevention of preeclampsia
for insureds who are determined to be at a high risk of that
condition after 12 weeks of gestation;
(c) Prophylactic ocular tubal medication for the prevention of
gonococcal ophthalmia in newborns;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 6 –
(d) Screening for asymptomatic bacteriuria for insureds who
are pregnant;
(e) Counseling and behavioral interventions relating to the
promotion of healthy weight gain and the prevention of excessive
weight gain for insureds who are pregnant;
(f) Counseling for insureds who are pregnant or in the
postpartum stage of pregnancy and have an increased risk of
perinatal or postpartum depression;
(g) Screening for the presence of the rhesus D antigen and
antibodies in the blood of an insured who is pregnant during the
insured’s first visit for care relating to the pregnancy;
(h) Screening for rhesus D antibodies between 24 and 28
weeks of gestation for insureds who are negative for the rhesus D
antigen and have not been exposed to blood that is positive for the
rhesus D antigen;
(i) Behavioral counseling and intervention for tobacco
cessation for insureds who are pregnant;
(j) Screening for type 2 diabetes at such intervals as
recommended by the Health Resources and Services
Administration on January 1, 2025, for insureds who are in the
postpartum stage of pregnancy and who have a history of
gestational diabetes mellitus;
(k) Counseling relating to maintaining a healthy weight for
women who are at least 40 but not more than 60 years of age and
have a body mass index greater than 18.5; and
(l) Screening for osteoporosis for women who:
(1) Are 65 years of age or older; or
(2) Are less than 65 years of age and have a risk of
fracturing a bone equal to or greater than that of a woman who is
65 years of age without any additional risk factors.
2. An insurer must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider
of health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, an insurer
that offers or issues a policy of health insurance shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of
health insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of health insurance or cancel a
policy of health insurance solely because the person applying for
or covered by the policy uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 7 –
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of
this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy
or the renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, an insurer may use medical management techniques,
including, without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to
determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit
required by this section or the type of provider of health care to
use for such treatment.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of medical
care, including items and services paid for as medical care, are
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers of
health care under contract with the insurer. The term does not
include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 5. 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of health
insurance shall include in the policy coverage for:
(a) Behavioral counseling and interventions to promote
physical activity and a healthy diet for insureds with
cardiovascular risk factors;
(b) Statin preventive medication for insureds who are at least
40 but not more than 75 years of age and do not have a history of
cardiovascular disease, but who have:
(1) One or more risk factors for cardiovascular disease;
and
-
*AB522_R1*

– 8 –
(2) A calculated risk of at least 10 percent of acquiring
cardiovascular disease within the next 10 years;
(c) Interventions for exercise to prevent falls for insureds who
are 65 years of age or older and reside in a medical facility or
facility for the dependent;
(d) Screenings for latent tuberculosis infection in insureds
with an increased risk of contracting tuberculosis;
(e) Screening for hypertension;
(f) One abdominal aortic screening by ultrasound to detect
abdominal aortic aneurysms for men who are at least 65 but not
more than 75 years of age and have smoked during their lifetimes;
(g) Screening for drug and alcohol misuse for insureds who
are 18 years of age or older;
(h) If an insured engages in risky or hazardous consumption
of alcohol, as determined by the screening described in paragraph
(g), behavioral counseling to reduce such behavior;
(i) Screening for lung cancer using low-dose computed
tomography for insureds who are at least 50 but not more than 80
years of age in accordance with the most recent guidelines
published by the American Cancer Society or the
recommendations of the United States Preventive Services Task
Force in effect on January 1, 2025;
(j) Screening for prediabetes and type 2 diabetes in insureds
who are at least 35 but not more than 70 years of age and have a
body mass index of 25 or greater; and
(k) Intensive behavioral interventions with multiple
components for insureds who are 18 years of age or older and
have a body mass index of 30 or greater.
2. The benefits provided pursuant to paragraph (h) of
subsection 1 are in addition to and separate from the benefits
provided pursuant to NRS 689A.046.
3. An insurer must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider
of health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, an insurer
that offers or issues a policy of health insurance shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of
health insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of health insurance or cancel a
policy of health insurance solely because the person applying for
or covered by the policy uses or may use any such benefit;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 9 –
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
5. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of
this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy
or the renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
6. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, an insurer may use medical management techniques,
including, without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to
determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit
required by this section or the type of provider of health care to
use for such treatment.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Computed tomography” means the process of producing
sectional and three-dimensional images using external ionizing
radiation.
(b) “Facility for the dependent” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 449.0045.
(c) “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
(d) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(e) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of medical
care, including items and services paid for as medical care, are
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers of
health care under contract with the insurer. The term does not
include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(f) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 10 –
Sec. 6. NRS 689A.033 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689A.033 1. An insurer that issues a policy of health
insurance shall not discriminate against any person with respect to
participation or coverage under the policy on the basis of an actual
or perceived [gender identity or expression.] protected
characteristic.
2. Prohibited discrimination includes, without limitation:
[1.] (a) Denying, cancelling, limiting or refusing to issue or
renew a policy of health insurance on the basis of [the] an actual or
perceived [gender identity or expression] protected characteristic of
a person or a family member of the person;
[2.] (b) Imposing a payment or premium that is based on [the]
an actual or perceived [gender identity or expression] protected
characteristic of an insured or a family member of the insured;
[3.] (c) Designating [the] an actual or perceived [gender
identity or expression] protected characteristic of a person or a
family member of the person as grounds to deny, cancel or limit
participation or coverage; and
[4.] (d) Denying, cancelling or limiting participation or
coverage on the basis of an actual or perceived [gender identity or
expression,] protected characteristic, including, without limitation,
by limiting or denying coverage for health care services that are:
[(a)] (1) Related to gender transition, provided that there is
coverage under the policy for the services when the services are not
related to gender transition; or
[(b)] (2) Ordinarily or exclusively available to persons of any
sex.
3. As used in this section, “protected characteristic” means:
(a) Race, color, national origin, age, physical or mental
disability, sexual orientation or gender identity or expression; or
(b) Sex, including, without limitation, sex characteristics,
intersex traits and pregnancy or related conditions.
Sec. 7. NRS 689A.04042 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.04042 1. A policy of health insurance [that provides
coverage for the treatment of colorectal cancer] must provide
coverage for colorectal cancer screening in accordance with:
(a) The guidelines concerning colorectal cancer screening which
are published by the American Cancer Society; or
(b) Other guidelines or reports concerning colorectal cancer
screening which are published by nationally recognized professional
organizations and which include current or prevailing supporting
scientific data.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 11 –
2. An insurer must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider
of health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
3. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of health
insurance shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of
health insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of health insurance or cancel a
policy of health insurance solely because the person applying for
or covered by the policy uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, [2003,] 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by this section, and any provision of the policy
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of medical
care, including items and services paid for as medical care, are
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers of
health care under contract with the insurer. The term does not
include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 8. NRS 689A.04049 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.04049 1. An insurer that issues a policy of health
insurance shall provide coverage for screening, genetic counseling
and testing for harmful mutations in the BRCA gene for women
under circumstances where such screening, genetic counseling or
testing, as applicable, is required by NRS 457.301.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 12 –
2. An insurer shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
3. An insurer that issues a policy of health insurance shall
not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of
health insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of health insurance or cancel a
policy of health insurance solely because the person applying for
or covered by the policy uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
[January] October 1, [2022,] 2025, has the legal effect of including
the coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the
policy that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
[4.] 5. As used in this section:
(a) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of medical
care, including items and services paid for as medical care, are
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 9. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10. NRS 689A.0412 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.0412 1. An insurer that issues a policy of health
insurance shall provide coverage for the examination of a person
who is pregnant for the discovery of:
-
*AB522_R1*

– 13 –
(a) Chlamydia trachomatis, gonorrhea, hepatitis B and hepatitis
C in accordance with NRS 442.013.
(b) Syphilis in accordance with NRS 442.010.
(c) Human immunodeficiency virus.
2. The coverage required by this section must be provided:
(a) Regardless of whether the benefits are provided to the
insured by a provider of health care, facility or medical laboratory
that participates in the network plan of the insurer; and
(b) Without prior authorization.
3. An insurer that issues a policy of health insurance shall
not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of
health insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of health insurance or cancel a
policy of health insurance solely because the person applying for
or covered by the policy uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
[3.] 4. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of
this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after [July] October 1, [2021,] 2025, has the legal effect of including
the coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the
policy that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
[4.] 5. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical laboratory” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 652.060.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of medical
care, including items and services paid for as medical care, are
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 14 –
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 11. NRS 689A.0419 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.0419 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
health insurance shall include in the policy coverage for:
(a) Counseling, support and supplies for breastfeeding,
including breastfeeding equipment, counseling and education during
the antenatal, perinatal and postpartum period for not more than 1
year;
(b) Screening and counseling for interpersonal and domestic
violence for women at least annually with intervention services
consisting of education, strategies to reduce harm, supportive
services or a referral for any other appropriate services;
(c) Behavioral counseling concerning sexually transmitted
diseases from a provider of health care for sexually active [women]
insureds who are at increased risk for such diseases;
(d) Such prenatal screenings and tests as recommended by the
American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists or its
successor organization;
(e) Screening for blood pressure abnormalities and diabetes,
including gestational diabetes, after at least 24 weeks of gestation or
as ordered by a provider of health care;
(f) Screening for cervical cancer at such intervals as are
recommended by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists or its successor organization;
(g) Screening for depression [;] for insureds who are 12 years
of age or older;
(h) Screening for anxiety disorders;
(i) Screening and counseling for the human immunodeficiency
virus consisting of a risk assessment, annual education relating to
prevention and at least one screening for the virus during the
lifetime of the insured or as ordered by a provider of health care;
[(i) Smoking]
(j) Tobacco cessation programs , including, without limitation,
pharmacotherapy approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration, for an insured who is 18 years of age or older ;
[consisting of not more than two cessation attempts per year and
four counseling sessions per year;
(j)] (k) All vaccinations recommended by the Advisory
Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease
Control and Prevention of the United States Department of Health
and Human Services or its successor organization; and
[(k)] (l) Such well-woman preventative visits as recommended
by the Health Resources and Services Administration [,] on
-
*AB522_R1*

– 15 –
January 1, 2025, which must include at least one such visit per year
beginning at 14 years of age.
2. An insurer must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, an insurer that
offers or issues a policy of health insurance shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of health
insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of health insurance or cancel a
policy of health insurance solely because the person applying for or
covered by the policy uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
[January] October 1, [2018,] 2025, has the legal effect of including
the coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the
policy or the renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
an insurer may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of medical
care, including items and services paid for as medical care, are
-
*AB522_R1*

– 16 –
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 12. NRS 689A.0424 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.0424 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
health insurance [that includes coverage for maternity care] shall not
deny, limit or seek reimbursement for maternity care because the
insured is acting as a gestational carrier.
2. If an insured acts as a gestational carrier, the child shall be
deemed to be a child of the intended parent, as defined in NRS
126.590, for purposes related to the policy of health insurance.
3. As used in this section, “gestational carrier” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 126.580.
Sec. 13. NRS 689A.0438 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.0438 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
health insurance shall include in the policy:
(a) Coverage of testing for and the treatment and prevention of
sexually transmitted diseases, including, without limitation,
Chlamydia trachomatis, gonorrhea, syphilis, human
immunodeficiency virus and hepatitis B and C, for all insureds,
regardless of age. Such coverage must include, without limitation,
the coverage required by NRS 689A.0412 and 689A.0437.
(b) Unrestricted coverage of condoms for insureds who are 13
years of age or older.
2. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of health
insurance shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of
health insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of health insurance or cancel a
policy of health insurance solely because the person applying for
or covered by the policy uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
-
*AB522_R1*

– 17 –
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
3. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
[January] October 1, [2024,] 2025, has the legal effect of including
the coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the
policy that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section, “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 14. NRS 689A.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689A.330 If any policy is issued by a domestic insurer for
delivery to a person residing in another state, and if the insurance
commissioner or corresponding public officer of that other state has
informed the Commissioner that the policy is not subject to approval
or disapproval by that officer, the Commissioner may by ruling
require that the policy meet the standards set forth in NRS 689A.030
to 689A.320, inclusive [.] , and sections 2 to 5, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 15. NRS 689A.717 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689A.717 1. An insurer that offers or issues an individual
health benefit plan subject to the provisions of this chapter shall
include in the plan coverage for maternity care and pediatric care
for newborn infants.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an
individual health benefit plan issued pursuant to this chapter [that
includes coverage for maternity care and pediatric care for newborn
infants] may not restrict benefits for any length of stay in a hospital
in connection with childbirth for a pregnant or postpartum
individual or newborn infant covered by the plan to:
(a) Less than 48 hours after a normal vaginal delivery; and
(b) Less than 96 hours after a cesarean section.
 If a different length of stay is provided in the guidelines
established by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists, or its successor organization, and the American
Academy of Pediatrics, or its successor organization, the individual
health benefit plan may follow such guidelines in lieu of following
the length of stay set forth above. The provisions of this subsection
do not apply to any individual health benefit plan in any case in
which the decision to discharge the pregnant or postpartum
individual or newborn infant before the expiration of the minimum
length of stay set forth in this subsection is made by the attending
physician of the pregnant or postpartum individual or newborn
infant.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 18 –
[2.] 3. Nothing in this section requires a pregnant or
postpartum individual to:
(a) Deliver the baby in a hospital; or
(b) Stay in a hospital for a fixed period following the birth of the
child.
[3.] 4. An individual health benefit plan [that offers coverage
for maternity care and pediatric care of newborn infants] may not:
(a) Deny a pregnant or postpartum individual or the newborn
infant coverage or continued coverage under the terms of the plan
[or coverage] if the sole purpose of the denial of coverage or
continued coverage is to avoid the requirements of this section;
(b) Provide monetary payments or rebates to a pregnant or
postpartum individual to encourage the individual to accept less than
the minimum protection available pursuant to this section;
(c) Penalize, or otherwise reduce or limit, the reimbursement of
an attending provider of health care because the attending provider
of health care provided care to a pregnant or postpartum individual
or newborn infant in accordance with the provisions of this section;
(d) Provide incentives of any kind to an attending physician to
induce the attending physician to provide care to a pregnant or
postpartum individual or newborn infant in a manner that is
inconsistent with the provisions of this section; or
(e) Except as otherwise provided in subsection [4,] 5, restrict
benefits for any portion of a hospital stay required pursuant to the
provisions of this section in a manner that is less favorable than the
benefits provided for any preceding portion of that stay.
[4.] 5. Nothing in this section:
(a) Prohibits an individual health benefit plan from imposing a
deductible, coinsurance or other mechanism for sharing costs
relating to benefits for hospital stays in connection with childbirth
for a pregnant or postpartum individual or newborn child covered by
the plan, except that such coinsurance or other mechanism for
sharing costs for any portion of a hospital stay required by this
section may not be greater than the coinsurance or other mechanism
for any preceding portion of that stay.
(b) Prohibits an arrangement for payment between an individual
health benefit plan and a provider of health care that uses capitation
or other financial incentives, if the arrangement is designed to
provide services efficiently and consistently in the best interest of
the pregnant or postpartum individual and the newborn infant.
(c) Prevents an individual health benefit plan from negotiating
with a provider of health care concerning the level and type of
reimbursement to be provided in accordance with this section.
6. An individual health benefit plan subject to the provisions
of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on
-
*AB522_R1*

– 19 –
or after October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by this section, and any provision of the plan
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
Sec. 16. Chapter 689B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 17 to 20, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 17. 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
group health insurance which provides coverage for dependent
children shall continue to make such coverage available for an
adult child of an insured until such child reaches 26 years of age.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring an
insurer to make coverage available for a dependent of an adult
child of an insured.
Sec. 18. 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
group health insurance shall include in the policy coverage for:
(a) Screening for anxiety for insureds who are at least 8 but
not more than 18 years of age;
(b) Assessments relating to height, weight, body mass index
and medical history for insureds who are less than 18 years of
age;
(c) Comprehensive and intensive behavioral interventions for
insureds who are at least 12 but not more than 18 years of age and
have a body mass index in the 95th percentile or greater for
persons of the same age and sex;
(d) The application of fluoride varnish to the primary teeth for
insureds who are less than 5 years of age;
(e) Oral fluoride supplements for insureds who are at least 6
months of age but less than 5 years of age and whose supply of
water is deficient in fluoride;
(f) Counseling pertaining to the minimization of exposure to
ultraviolet radiation for insureds who are less than 24 years of age
and the parents or legal guardians of insureds who are less than
18 years of age for the purpose of minimizing the risk of skin
cancer in those persons;
(g) Brief behavioral counseling and interventions to prevent
tobacco use for insureds who are less than 18 years of age; and
(h) At least one screening for the detection of amblyopia or the
risk factors of amblyopia for insureds who are at least 3 but not
more than 5 years of age.
2. An insurer must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider
of health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, an insurer
that offers or issues a policy of group health insurance shall not:
-
*AB522_R1*

– 20 –
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of
group health insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of group health insurance or
cancel a policy of group health insurance solely because the
person applying for or covered by the policy uses or may use any
such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(e) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A policy of group health insurance subject to the
provisions of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or
renewed on or after October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of
including the coverage required by subsection 1, and any
provision of the policy or the renewal which is in conflict with this
section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, an insurer may use medical management techniques,
including, without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to
determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit
required by this section or the type of provider of health care to
use for such treatment.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of group health insurance
offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers of health care under contract with the insurer. The term
does not include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 19. 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
group health insurance shall include in the policy coverage for:
-
*AB522_R1*

– 21 –
(a) A daily dose of 0.4 to 0.8 milligrams of folic acid for
insureds who are pregnant or are planning on becoming
pregnant;
(b) A low dose of aspirin for the prevention of preeclampsia
for insureds who are determined to be at a high risk of that
condition after 12 weeks of gestation;
(c) Prophylactic ocular tubal medication for the prevention of
gonococcal ophthalmia in newborns;
(d) Counseling and behavioral interventions relating to the
promotion of healthy weight gain and the prevention of excessive
weight gain for insureds who are pregnant;
(e) Counseling for insureds who are pregnant or in the
postpartum stage of pregnancy and have an increased risk of
perinatal or postpartum depression;
(f) Screening for the presence of the rhesus D antigen and
antibodies in the blood of an insured who is pregnant during the
insured’s first visit for care relating to the pregnancy;
(g) Screening for rhesus D antibodies between 24 and 28
weeks of gestation for insureds who are negative for the rhesus D
antigen and have not been exposed to blood that is positive for the
rhesus D antigen;
(h) Behavioral counseling and intervention for tobacco
cessation for insureds who are pregnant;
(i) Screening for type 2 diabetes at such intervals as
recommended by the Health Resources and Services
Administration on January 1, 2025, for insureds who are in the
postpartum stage of pregnancy and who have a history of
gestational diabetes mellitus;
(j) Counseling relating to maintaining a healthy weight for
women who are at least 40 but not more than 60 years of age and
have a body mass index greater than 18.5; and
(k) Screening for osteoporosis for women who:
(1) Are 65 years of age or older; or
(2) Are less than 65 years of age and have a risk of
fracturing a bone equal to or greater than that of a woman who is
65 years of age without any additional risk factors.
2. An insurer must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider
of health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, an insurer
that offers or issues a policy of group health insurance shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of
group health insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 22 –
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of group health insurance or
cancel a policy of group health insurance solely because the
person applying for or covered by the policy uses or may use any
such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(e) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A policy of group health insurance subject to the
provisions of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or
renewed on or after October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of
including the coverage required by subsection 1, and any
provision of the policy or the renewal which is in conflict with this
section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, an insurer may use medical management techniques,
including, without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to
determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit
required by this section or the type of provider of health care to
use for such treatment.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of group health insurance
offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers of health care under contract with the insurer. The term
does not include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 20. 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
group health insurance shall include in the policy coverage for:
(a) Behavioral counseling and interventions to promote
physical activity and a healthy diet for insureds with
cardiovascular risk factors;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 23 –
(b) Statin preventive medication for insureds who are at least
40 but not more than 75 years of age and do not have a history of
cardiovascular disease, but who have:
(1) One or more risk factors for cardiovascular disease;
and
(2) A calculated risk of at least 10 percent of acquiring
cardiovascular disease within the next 10 years;
(c) Interventions for exercise to prevent falls for insureds who
are 65 years of age or older and reside in a medical facility or
facility for the dependent;
(d) Screenings for latent tuberculosis infection in insureds
with an increased risk of contracting tuberculosis;
(e) Screening for hypertension;
(f) One abdominal aortic screening by ultrasound to detect
abdominal aortic aneurysms for men who are at least 65 but not
more than 75 years of age and have smoked during their lifetimes;
(g) Screening for drug and alcohol misuse for insureds who
are 18 years of age or older;
(h) If an insured engages in risky or hazardous consumption
of alcohol, as determined by the screening described in paragraph
(g), behavioral counseling to reduce such behavior;
(i) Screening for lung cancer using low-dose computed
tomography for insureds who are at least 50 but not more than 80
years of age in accordance with the most recent guidelines
published by the American Cancer Society or the
recommendations of the United States Preventive Services Task
Force in effect on January 1, 2025;
(j) Screening for prediabetes and type 2 diabetes in insureds
who are at least 35 but not more than 70 years of age and have a
body mass index of 25 or greater; and
(k) Intensive behavioral interventions with multiple
components for insureds who are 18 years of age or older and
have a body mass index of 30 or greater.
2. An insurer must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider
of health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, an insurer
that offers or issues a policy of group health insurance shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of
group health insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of group health insurance or
cancel a policy of group health insurance solely because the
-
*AB522_R1*

– 24 –
person applying for or covered by the policy uses or may use any
such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(e) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A policy of group health insurance subject to the
provisions of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or
renewed on or after October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of
including the coverage required by subsection 1, and any
provision of the policy or the renewal which is in conflict with this
section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, an insurer may use medical management techniques,
including, without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to
determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit
required by this section or the type of provider of health care to
use for such treatment.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Computed tomography” means the process of producing
sectional and three-dimensional images using external ionizing
radiation.
(b) “Facility for the dependent” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 449.0045.
(c) “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
(d) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(e) “Network plan” means a policy of group health insurance
offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers of health care under contract with the insurer. The term
does not include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(f) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 25 –
Sec. 21. NRS 689B.0314 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.0314 1. An insurer that issues a policy of group health
insurance shall provide coverage for screening, genetic counseling
and testing for harmful mutations in the BRCA gene for women
under circumstances where such screening, genetic counseling or
testing, as applicable, is required by NRS 457.301.
2. An insurer shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
3. An insurer that issues a policy of group health insurance
shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of
group health insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of group health insurance or
cancel a policy of group health insurance solely because the
person applying for or covered by the policy uses or may use any
such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(e) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A policy of group health insurance subject to the provisions
of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after [January] October 1, [2022,] 2025, has the legal effect of
including the coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision
of the policy that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
[4.] 5. As used in this section:
(a) “Network plan” means a policy of group health insurance
offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 26 –
Sec. 22. NRS 689B.0315 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.0315 1. An insurer that issues a policy of group health
insurance shall provide coverage for the examination of a person
who is pregnant for the discovery of:
(a) Chlamydia trachomatis, gonorrhea, hepatitis B and hepatitis
C in accordance with NRS 442.013.
(b) Syphilis in accordance with NRS 442.010.
(c) Human immunodeficiency virus.
2. The coverage required by this section must be provided:
(a) Regardless of whether the benefits are provided to the
insured by a provider of health care, facility or medical laboratory
that participates in the network plan of the insurer; and
(b) Without prior authorization.
3. An insurer that issues a policy of group health insurance
shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of
group health insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of group health insurance or
cancel a policy of group health insurance solely because the
person applying for or covered by the policy uses or may use any
such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(e) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
[July] October 1, [2021,] 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
[4.] 5. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical laboratory” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 652.060.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of group health insurance
offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
-
*AB522_R1*

– 27 –
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 23. NRS 689B.0316 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.0316 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
group health insurance shall include in the policy:
(a) Coverage of testing for and the treatment of and prevention
of sexually transmitted diseases, including, without limitation,
Chlamydia trachomatis, gonorrhea, syphilis, human
immunodeficiency virus and hepatitis B and C, for all insureds,
regardless of age. Such coverage must include, without limitation,
the coverage required by NRS 689B.0312 and 689B.0315.
(b) Unrestricted coverage of condoms for insureds who are 13
years of age or older.
2. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of group health
insurance shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of
group health insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of group health insurance or
cancel a policy of group health insurance solely because the
person applying for or covered by the policy uses or may use any
such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(e) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
3. A policy of group health insurance subject to the provisions
of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after [January] October 1, [2024,] 2025, has the legal effect of
including the coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision
of the policy that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section, “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 28 –
Sec. 24. NRS 689B.0367 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.0367 1. A policy of group health insurance [that
provides coverage for the treatment of colorectal cancer] must
provide coverage for colorectal cancer screening in accordance
with:
(a) The guidelines concerning colorectal cancer screening which
are published by the American Cancer Society; or
(b) Other guidelines or reports concerning colorectal cancer
screening which are published by nationally recognized professional
organizations and which include current or prevailing supporting
scientific data.
2. An insurer must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider
of health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
3. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of group health
insurance shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of
group health insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of group health insurance or
cancel a policy of group health insurance solely because the
person applying for or covered by the policy uses or may use any
such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(e) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A policy of group health insurance subject to the provisions
of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after October 1, [2003,] 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by this section, and any provision of the policy
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Network plan” means a policy of group health insurance
offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
-
*AB522_R1*

– 29 –
providers of health care under contract with the insurer. The term
does not include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 25. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 26. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 27. NRS 689B.03785 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.03785 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
group health insurance shall include in the policy coverage for:
(a) Counseling, support and supplies for breastfeeding,
including breastfeeding equipment, counseling and education during
the antenatal, perinatal and postpartum period for not more than 1
year;
(b) Screening and counseling for interpersonal and domestic
violence for women at least annually with initial intervention
services consisting of education, strategies to reduce harm,
supportive services or a referral for any other appropriate services;
(c) Behavioral counseling concerning sexually transmitted
diseases from a provider of health care for sexually active [women]
insureds who are at increased risk for such diseases;
(d) Such prenatal screenings and tests as recommended by the
American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists or its
successor organization;
(e) Screening for blood pressure abnormalities and diabetes,
including gestational diabetes, after at least 24 weeks of gestation or
as ordered by a provider of health care;
(f) Screening for cervical cancer at such intervals as are
recommended by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists or its successor organization;
(g) Screening for depression [;] for insureds who are 12 years
of age or older;
(h) Screening for anxiety disorders;
(i) Screening and counseling for the human immunodeficiency
virus consisting of a risk assessment, annual education relating to
prevention and at least one screening for the virus during the
lifetime of the insured or as ordered by a provider of health care;
[(i) Smoking]
(j) Tobacco cessation programs , including, without limitation,
pharmacotherapy approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration, for an insured who is 18 years of age or older ;
[consisting of not more than two cessation attempts per year and
four counseling sessions per year;
(j)] (k) All vaccinations recommended by the Advisory
Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease
-
*AB522_R1*

– 30 –
Control and Prevention of the United States Department of Health
and Human Services or its successor organization; and
[(k)] (l) Such well-woman preventative visits as recommended
by the Health Resources and Services Administration [,] on
January 1, 2025, which must include at least one such visit per year
beginning at 14 years of age.
2. An insurer must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, an insurer that
offers or issues a policy of group health insurance shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of group
health insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of group health insurance or cancel a
policy of group health insurance solely because the person applying
for or covered by the policy uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) [Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e)] Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
[(f)] (e) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of
an insured to any such benefit.
4. A policy subject to the provisions of this chapter that is
delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after [January]
October 1, [2018,] 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy
or the renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
an insurer may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
-
*AB522_R1*

– 31 –
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of group health insurance
offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 28. NRS 689B.0675 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.0675 1. An insurer that issues a policy of group health
insurance shall not discriminate against any person with respect to
participation or coverage under the policy on the basis of an actual
or perceived [gender identity or expression.] protected
characteristic.
2. Prohibited discrimination includes, without limitation:
[1.] (a) Denying, cancelling, limiting or refusing to issue or
renew a policy of group health insurance on the basis of [the] an
actual or perceived [gender identity or expression] protected
characteristic of a person or a family member of the person;
[2.] (b) Imposing a payment or premium that is based on [the]
an actual or perceived [gender identity or expression] protected
characteristic of an insured or a family member of the insured;
[3.] (c) Designating [the] an actual or perceived [gender
identity or expression] protected characteristic of a person or a
family member of the person as grounds to deny, cancel or limit
participation or coverage; and
[4.] (d) Denying, cancelling or limiting participation or
coverage on the basis of an actual or perceived [gender identity or
expression,] protected characteristic, including, without limitation,
by limiting or denying coverage for health care services that are:
[(a)] (1) Related to gender transition, provided that there is
coverage under the policy for the services when the services are not
related to gender transition; or
[(b)] (2) Ordinarily or exclusively available to persons of any
sex.
3. As used in this section, “protected characteristic” means:
(a) Race, color, national origin, age, physical or mental
disability, sexual orientation or gender identity or expression; or
(b) Sex, including, without limitation, sex characteristics,
intersex traits and pregnancy or related conditions.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 32 –
Sec. 29. NRS 689B.520 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689B.520 1. An insurer that offers or issues a group health
plan subject to the provisions of this chapter shall include in the
plan coverage for maternity care and pediatric care for newborn
infants.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a group
health plan or coverage offered under group health insurance issued
pursuant to this chapter [that includes coverage for maternity care
and pediatric care for newborn infants] may not restrict benefits for
any length of stay in a hospital in connection with childbirth for a
pregnant or postpartum individual or newborn infant covered by the
plan or coverage to:
(a) Less than 48 hours after a normal vaginal delivery; and
(b) Less than 96 hours after a cesarean section.
 If a different length of stay is provided in the guidelines
established by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists, or its successor organization, and the American
Academy of Pediatrics, or its successor organization, the group
health plan or health insurance coverage may follow such guidelines
in lieu of following the length of stay set forth above. The
provisions of this subsection do not apply to any group health plan
or health insurance coverage in any case in which the decision to
discharge the pregnant or postpartum individual or newborn infant
before the expiration of the minimum length of stay set forth in this
subsection is made by the attending physician of the pregnant or
postpartum individual or newborn infant.
[2.] 3. Nothing in this section requires a pregnant or
postpartum individual to:
(a) Deliver the baby in a hospital; or
(b) Stay in a hospital for a fixed period following the birth of the
child.
[3.] 4. A group health plan or coverage under group health
insurance [that offers coverage for maternity care and pediatric care
of newborn infants] may not:
(a) Deny a pregnant or postpartum individual or the newborn
infant coverage or continued coverage under the terms of the plan
[or coverage] if the sole purpose of the denial of coverage or
continued coverage is to avoid the requirements of this section;
(b) Provide monetary payments or rebates to a pregnant or
postpartum individual to encourage the individual to accept less than
the minimum protection available pursuant to this section;
(c) [Penalize, or otherwise reduce or limit, the reimbursement of
an attending provider of health care because the attending provider
of health care provided care to a pregnant or postpartum individual
or newborn infant in accordance with the provisions of this section;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 33 –
(d)] Provide incentives of any kind to an attending physician to
induce the attending physician to provide care to a pregnant or
postpartum individual or newborn infant in a manner that is
inconsistent with the provisions of this section; or
[(e)] (d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection [4,] 5,
restrict benefits for any portion of a hospital stay required pursuant
to the provisions of this section in a manner that is less favorable
than the benefits provided for any preceding portion of that stay.
[4.] 5. Nothing in this section:
(a) Prohibits a group health plan or carrier from imposing a
deductible, coinsurance or other mechanism for sharing costs
relating to benefits for hospital stays in connection with childbirth
for a pregnant or postpartum individual or newborn child covered by
the plan, except that such coinsurance or other mechanism for
sharing costs for any portion of a hospital stay required by this
section may not be greater than the coinsurance or other mechanism
for any preceding portion of that stay.
(b) Prohibits an arrangement for payment between a group
health plan or carrier and a provider of health care that uses
capitation or other financial incentives, if the arrangement is
designed to provide services efficiently and consistently in the best
interest of the pregnant or postpartum individual and the newborn
infant.
(c) Prevents a group health plan or carrier from negotiating with
a provider of health care concerning the level and type of
reimbursement to be provided in accordance with this section.
6. A group health plan subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by this section, and any provision of the plan that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
Sec. 30. Chapter 689C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 31 to 35, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 31. 1. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit
plan which provides coverage for dependent children shall
continue to make such coverage available for an adult child of an
insured until such child reaches 26 years of age.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a
carrier to make coverage available for a dependent of an adult
child of an insured.
Sec. 32. 1. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit
plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) Screening for anxiety for insureds who are at least 8 but
not more than 18 years of age;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 34 –
(b) Assessments relating to height, weight, body mass index
and medical history for insureds who are less than 18 years of
age;
(c) Comprehensive and intensive behavioral interventions for
insureds who are at least 12 but not more than 18 years of age and
have a body mass index in the 95th percentile or greater for
persons of the same age and sex;
(d) The application of fluoride varnish to the primary teeth for
insureds who are less than 5 years of age;
(e) Oral fluoride supplements for insureds who are at least 6
months of age but less than 5 years of age and whose supply of
water is deficient in fluoride;
(f) Counseling and education pertaining to the minimization of
exposure to ultraviolet radiation for insureds who are less than 25
years of age and the parents or legal guardians of insureds who
are less than 18 years of age for the purpose of minimizing the
risk of skin cancer in those persons;
(g) Brief behavioral counseling and interventions to prevent
tobacco use for insureds who are less than 18 years of age; and
(h) At least one screening for the detection of amblyopia or the
risk factors of amblyopia for insureds who are at least 3 but not
more than 5 years of age.
2. A carrier must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider
of health care who participates in the network plan of the carrier.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a carrier that
offers or issues a health benefit plan shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health benefit
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health benefit plan or cancel a health
benefit plan solely because the person applying for or covered by
the plan uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
-
*AB522_R1*

– 35 –
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A health benefit plan subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan or the
renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, a carrier may use medical management techniques,
including, without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to
determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit
required by this section or the type of provider of health care to
use for such treatment.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 33. 1. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit
plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) A daily dose of 0.4 to 0.8 milligrams of folic acid for
insureds who are pregnant or are planning on becoming
pregnant;
(b) A low dose of aspirin for the prevention of preeclampsia
for insureds who are determined to be at a high risk of that
condition after 12 weeks of gestation;
(c) Prophylactic ocular tubal medication for the prevention of
gonococcal ophthalmia in newborns;
(d) Screening for asymptomatic bacteriuria for insureds who
are pregnant;
(e) Counseling and behavioral interventions relating to the
promotion of healthy weight gain and the prevention of excessive
weight gain for insureds who are pregnant;
(f) Counseling for insureds who are pregnant or in the
postpartum stage of pregnancy and have an increased risk of
perinatal or postpartum depression;
(g) Screening for the presence of the rhesus D antigen and
antibodies in the blood of an insured who is pregnant during the
insured’s first visit for care relating to the pregnancy;
(h) Screening for rhesus D antibodies between 24 and 28
weeks of gestation for insureds who are negative for the rhesus D
-
*AB522_R1*

– 36 –
antigen and have not been exposed to blood that is positive for the
rhesus D antigen;
(i) Behavioral counseling and intervention for tobacco
cessation for insureds who are pregnant;
(j) Screening for type 2 diabetes at such intervals as
recommended by the Health Resources and Services
Administration on January 1, 2025, for insureds who are in the
postpartum stage of pregnancy and who have a history of
gestational diabetes mellitus;
(k) Counseling relating to maintaining a healthy weight for
women who are at least 40 but not more than 60 years of age and
have a body mass index greater than 18.5; and
(l) Screening for osteoporosis for women who:
(1) Are 65 years of age or older; or
(2) Are less than 65 years of age and have a risk of
fracturing a bone equal to or greater than that of a woman who is
65 years of age without any additional risk factors.
2. A carrier must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider
of health care who participates in the network plan of the carrier.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a carrier that
offers or issues a health benefit plan shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health benefit
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health benefit plan or cancel a health
benefit plan solely because the person applying for or covered by
the plan uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A health benefit plan subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the coverage
-
*AB522_R1*

– 37 –
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan or the
renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, a carrier may use medical management techniques,
including, without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to
determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit
required by this section or the type of provider of health care to
use for such treatment.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 34. 1. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit
plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) Behavioral counseling and interventions to promote
physical activity and a healthy diet for insureds with
cardiovascular risk factors;
(b) Statin preventive medication for insureds who are at least
40 but not more than 75 years of age and do not have a history of
cardiovascular disease, but who have:
(1) One or more risk factors for cardiovascular disease;
and
(2) A calculated risk of at least 10 percent of acquiring
cardiovascular disease within the next 10 years;
(c) Interventions for exercise to prevent falls for insureds who
are 65 years of age or older and reside in a medical facility or
facility for the dependent;
(d) Screenings for latent tuberculosis infection in insureds
with an increased risk of contracting tuberculosis;
(e) Screening for hypertension;
(f) One abdominal aortic screening by ultrasound to detect
abdominal aortic aneurysms for men who are at least 65 but not
more than 75 years of age and have smoked during their lifetimes;
(g) Screening for drug and alcohol misuse for insureds who
are 18 years of age or older;
(h) If an insured engages in risky or hazardous consumption
of alcohol, as determined by the screening described in paragraph
(g), behavioral counseling to reduce such behavior;
(i) Screening for lung cancer using low-dose computed
tomography for insureds who are at least 50 but not more than 80
years of age in accordance with the most recent guidelines
-
*AB522_R1*

– 38 –
published by the American Cancer Society or the
recommendations of the United States Preventive Services Task
Force in effect on January 1, 2025;
(j) Screening for prediabetes and type 2 diabetes in insureds
who are at least 35 but not more than 70 years of age and have a
body mass index of 25 or greater; and
(k) Intensive behavioral interventions with multiple
components for insureds who are 18 years of age or older and
have a body mass index of 30 or greater.
2. The benefits provided pursuant to paragraph (h) of
subsection 1 are in addition to and separate from the benefits
provided pursuant to NRS 689C.167.
3. A carrier must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider
of health care who participates in the network plan of the carrier.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, a carrier that
offers or issues a health benefit plan shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health benefit
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health benefit plan or cancel a health
benefit plan solely because the person applying for or covered by
the plan uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
5. A health benefit plan subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan or the
renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
6. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, a carrier may use medical management techniques,
including, without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to
determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit
-
*AB522_R1*

– 39 –
required by this section or the type of provider of health care to
use for such treatment.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Computed tomography” means the process of producing
sectional and three-dimensional images using external ionizing
radiation.
(b) “Facility for the dependent” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 449.0045.
(c) “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
(d) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(e) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 35. 1. A health benefit plan must provide coverage for
colorectal cancer screening in accordance with:
(a) The guidelines concerning colorectal cancer screening
which are published by the American Cancer Society; or
(b) Other guidelines or reports concerning colorectal cancer
screening which are published by nationally recognized
professional organizations and which include current or
prevailing supporting scientific data.
2. A carrier must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider
of health care who participates in the network plan of the carrier.
3. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit plan shall
not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health benefit
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health benefit plan or cancel a health
benefit plan solely because the person applying for or covered by
the plan uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
-
*AB522_R1*

– 40 –
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A health benefit plan subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by this section, and any provision of the policy that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
5. As used in this section, “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 36. NRS 689C.1653 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.1653 1. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit
plan shall include in the plan:
(a) Coverage of testing for and the treatment and prevention of
sexually transmitted diseases, including, without limitation,
Chlamydia trachomatis, gonorrhea, syphilis, human
immunodeficiency virus and hepatitis B and C, for all insureds,
regardless of age. Such coverage must include, without limitation,
the coverage required by NRS 689C.1671 and 689C.1675.
(b) Unrestricted coverage of condoms for insureds who are 13
years of age or older.
2. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit plan shall
not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health benefit
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health benefit plan or cancel a health
benefit plan solely because the person applying for or covered by
the plan uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 41 –
3. A health benefit plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after [January]
October 1, [2024,] 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section, “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 37. NRS 689C.1673 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.1673 1. A carrier that issues a health benefit plan shall
provide coverage for screening, genetic counseling and testing for
harmful mutations in the BRCA gene for women under
circumstances where such screening, genetic counseling or testing,
as applicable, is required by NRS 457.301.
2. A carrier shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the carrier.
3. A carrier that issues a health benefit plan shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health benefit
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health benefit plan or cancel a health
benefit plan solely because the person applying for or covered by
the plan uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A health benefit plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after [January]
October 1, [2022,] 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
[4.] 5. As used in this section, “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 38. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
*AB522_R1*

– 42 –
Sec. 39. NRS 689C.1675 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.1675 1. A carrier that issues a health benefit plan shall
provide coverage for the examination of a person who is pregnant
for the discovery of:
(a) Chlamydia trachomatis, gonorrhea, hepatitis B and hepatitis
C in accordance with NRS 442.013.
(b) Syphilis in accordance with NRS 442.010.
(c) Human immunodeficiency virus.
2. The coverage required by this section must be provided:
(a) Regardless of whether the benefits are provided to the
insured by a provider of health care, facility or medical laboratory
that participates in the network plan of the carrier; and
(b) Without prior authorization.
3. A carrier that issues a health benefit plan shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health benefit
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health benefit plan or cancel a health
benefit plan solely because the person applying for or covered by
the plan uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A health benefit plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after [July]
October 1, [2021,] 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
[4.] 5. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical laboratory” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 652.060.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 43 –
Sec. 40. NRS 689C.1678 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.1678 1. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit
plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) Counseling, support and supplies for breastfeeding,
including breastfeeding equipment, counseling and education during
the antenatal, perinatal and postpartum period for not more than 1
year;
(b) Screening and counseling for interpersonal and domestic
violence for women at least annually, with initial intervention
services consisting of education, strategies to reduce harm,
supportive services or a referral for any other appropriate services;
(c) Behavioral counseling concerning sexually transmitted
diseases from a provider of health care for sexually active [women]
insureds who are at increased risk for such diseases;
(d) Hormone replacement therapy;
(e) Such prenatal screenings and tests as recommended by the
American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists or its
successor organization;
(f) Screening for blood pressure abnormalities and diabetes,
including gestational diabetes, after at least 24 weeks of gestation or
as ordered by a provider of health care;
(g) Screening for cervical cancer at such intervals as are
recommended by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists or its successor organization;
(h) Screening for depression [;] for insureds who are 12 years
of age or older;
(i) Screening for anxiety disorders;
(j) Screening and counseling for the human immunodeficiency
virus consisting of a risk assessment, annual education relating to
prevention and at least one screening for the virus during the
lifetime of the insured or as ordered by a provider of health care;
[(j) Smoking]
(k) Tobacco cessation programs , including, without limitation,
pharmacotherapy approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration, for an insured who is 18 years of age or older ;
[consisting of not more than two cessation attempts per year and
four counseling sessions per year;
(k)] (l) All vaccinations recommended by the Advisory
Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease
Control and Prevention of the United States Department of Health
and Human Services or its successor organization; and
[(l)] (m) Such well-woman preventative visits as recommended
by the Health Resources and Services Administration [,] on
-
*AB522_R1*

– 44 –
January 1, 2025, which must include at least one such visit per year
beginning at 14 years of age.
2. A carrier must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the carrier.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a carrier that
offers or issues a health benefit plan shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health benefit
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health benefit plan or cancel a health
benefit plan solely because the person applying for or covered by
the plan uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A plan subject to the provisions of this chapter that is
delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after [January]
October 1, [2018,] 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan or
the renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
a carrier may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health benefit plan offered by a
carrier under which the financing and delivery of medical care,
including items and services paid for as medical care, are provided,
-
*AB522_R1*

– 45 –
in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract
with the carrier. The term does not include an arrangement for the
financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 41. NRS 689C.194 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689C.194 1. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit
plan subject to the provisions of this chapter shall include in the
plan coverage for maternity care and pediatric care for newborn
infants.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a health
benefit plan issued pursuant to this chapter [that includes coverage
for maternity care and pediatric care for newborn infants] may not
restrict benefits for any length of stay in a hospital in connection
with childbirth for a pregnant or postpartum individual or newborn
infant covered by the plan to:
(a) Less than 48 hours after a normal vaginal delivery; and
(b) Less than 96 hours after a cesarean section.
 If a different length of stay is provided in the guidelines
established by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists, or its successor organization, and the American
Academy of Pediatrics, or its successor organization, the health
benefit plan may follow such guidelines in lieu of following the
length of stay set forth above. The provisions of this subsection do
not apply to any health benefit plan in any case in which the
decision to discharge the pregnant or postpartum individual or
newborn infant before the expiration of the minimum length of stay
set forth in this subsection is made by the attending physician of the
pregnant or postpartum individual or newborn infant.
[2.] 3. Nothing in this section requires a pregnant or
postpartum individual to:
(a) Deliver the baby in a hospital; or
(b) Stay in a hospital for a fixed period following the birth of the
child.
[3.] 4. A health benefit plan [that offers coverage for maternity
care and pediatric care of newborn infants] may not:
(a) Deny a pregnant or postpartum individual or the newborn
infant coverage or continued coverage under the terms of the plan if
the sole purpose of the denial of coverage or continued coverage is
to avoid the requirements of this section;
(b) Provide monetary payments or rebates to a pregnant or
postpartum individual to encourage the individual to accept less than
the minimum protection available pursuant to this section;
(c) Penalize, or otherwise reduce or limit, the reimbursement of
an attending provider of health care because the attending provider
-
*AB522_R1*

– 46 –
of health care provided care to a pregnant or postpartum individual
or newborn infant in accordance with the provisions of this section;
(d) Provide incentives of any kind to an attending physician to
induce the attending physician to provide care to a pregnant or
postpartum individual or newborn infant in a manner that is
inconsistent with the provisions of this section; or
(e) Except as otherwise provided in subsection [4,] 5, restrict
benefits for any portion of a hospital stay required pursuant to the
provisions of this section in a manner that is less favorable than the
benefits provided for any preceding portion of that stay.
[4.] 5. Nothing in this section:
(a) Prohibits a health benefit plan or carrier from imposing a
deductible, coinsurance or other mechanism for sharing costs
relating to benefits for hospital stays in connection with childbirth
for a pregnant or postpartum individual or newborn child covered by
the plan, except that such coinsurance or other mechanism for
sharing costs for any portion of a hospital stay required by this
section may not be greater than the coinsurance or other mechanism
for any preceding portion of that stay.
(b) Prohibits an arrangement for payment between a health
benefit plan or carrier and a provider of health care that uses
capitation or other financial incentives, if the arrangement is
designed to provide services efficiently and consistently in the best
interest of the pregnant or postpartum individual and the newborn
infant.
(c) Prevents a health benefit plan or carrier from negotiating
with a provider of health care concerning the level and type of
reimbursement to be provided in accordance with this section.
6. A health benefit plan subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by this section, and any provision of the plan that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
Sec. 42. NRS 689C.1945 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.1945 1. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit
plan [that includes coverage for maternity care] shall not deny, limit
or seek reimbursement for maternity care because the insured is
acting as a gestational carrier.
2. If an insured acts as a gestational carrier, the child shall be
deemed to be a child of the intended parent, as defined in NRS
126.590, for purposes related to the health benefit plan.
3. As used in this section, “gestational carrier” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 126.580.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 47 –
Sec. 43. NRS 689C.1975 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.1975 1. A carrier that issues a health benefit plan shall
not discriminate against any person with respect to participation or
coverage under the plan on the basis of an actual or perceived
[gender identity or expression.] protected characteristic.
2. Prohibited discrimination includes, without limitation:
[1.] (a) Denying, cancelling, limiting or refusing to issue or
renew a health benefit plan on the basis of [the] an actual or
perceived [gender identity or expression] protected characteristic of
a person or a family member of the person;
[2.] (b) Imposing a payment or premium that is based on [the]
an actual or perceived [gender identity or expression] protected
characteristic of an insured or a family member of the insured;
[3.] (c) Designating [the] an actual or perceived [gender
identity or expression] protected characteristic of a person or a
family member of the person as grounds to deny, cancel or limit
participation or coverage; and
[4.] (d) Denying, cancelling or limiting participation or
coverage on the basis of an actual or perceived [gender identity or
expression,] protected characteristic, including, without limitation,
by limiting or denying coverage for health care services that are:
[(a)] (1) Related to gender transition, provided that there is
coverage under the plan for the services when the services are not
related to gender transition; or
[(b)] (2) Ordinarily or exclusively available to persons of any
sex.
3. As used in this section, “protected characteristic” means:
(a) Race, color, national origin, age, physical or mental
disability, sexual orientation or gender identity or expression; or
(b) Sex, including, without limitation, sex characteristics,
intersex traits and pregnancy or related conditions.
Sec. 44. NRS 689C.425 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689C.425 A voluntary purchasing group and any contract
issued to such a group pursuant to NRS 689C.360 to 689C.600,
inclusive, are subject to the provisions of NRS 689C.015 to
689C.355, inclusive, and sections 31 to 35, inclusive, of this act to
the extent applicable and not in conflict with the express provisions
of NRS 687B.408 and 689C.360 to 689C.600, inclusive.
Sec. 45. Chapter 695A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 46 to 51, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 46. 1. A society that offers or issues a benefit contract
which provides coverage for dependent children shall continue to
-
*AB522_R1*

– 48 –
make such coverage available for an adult child of an insured
until such child reaches 26 years of age.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a
society to make coverage available for a dependent of an adult
child of an insured.
Sec. 47. 1. A society that offers or issues a benefit contract
shall include in the benefit contract coverage for:
(a) Screening for anxiety for insureds who are at least 8 but
not more than 18 years of age;
(b) Assessments relating to height, weight, body mass index
and medical history for insureds who are less than 18 years of
age;
(c) Comprehensive and intensive behavioral interventions for
insureds who are at least 12 but not more than 18 years of age and
have a body mass index in the 95th percentile or greater for
persons of the same age and sex;
(d) The application of fluoride varnish to the primary teeth for
insureds who are less than 5 years of age;
(e) Oral fluoride supplements for insureds who are at least 6
months of age but less than 5 years of age and whose supply of
water is deficient in fluoride;
(f) Counseling and education pertaining to the minimization of
exposure to ultraviolet radiation for insureds who are less than 25
years of age and the parents or legal guardians of insureds who
are less than 18 years of age for the purpose of minimizing the
risk of skin cancer in those persons;
(g) Brief behavioral counseling and interventions to prevent
tobacco use for insureds who are less than 18 years of age; and
(h) At least one screening for the detection of amblyopia or the
risk factors of amblyopia for insureds who are at least 3 but not
more than 5 years of age.
2. A society must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider
of health care who participates in the network plan of the society.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a society that
offers or issues a benefit contract shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the benefit
contract pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a benefit contract or cancel a benefit
contract solely because the person applying for or covered by the
benefit contract uses or may use any such benefit;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 49 –
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the contract or the
renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, a society may use medical management techniques,
including, without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to
determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit
required by this section or the type of provider of health care to
use for such treatment.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a benefit contract offered by a
society under which the financing and delivery of medical care,
including items and services paid for as medical care, are
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers of
health care under contract with the society. The term does not
include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 48. 1. A society that offers or issues a benefit contract
shall include in the benefit contract coverage for:
(a) A daily dose of 0.4 to 0.8 milligrams of folic acid for
insureds who are pregnant or are planning on becoming
pregnant;
(b) A low dose of aspirin for the prevention of preeclampsia
for insureds who are determined to be at a high risk of that
condition after 12 weeks of gestation;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 50 –
(c) Prophylactic ocular tubal medication for the prevention of
gonococcal ophthalmia in newborns;
(d) Screening for asymptomatic bacteriuria for insureds who
are pregnant;
(e) Counseling and behavioral interventions relating to the
promotion of healthy weight gain and the prevention of excessive
weight gain for insureds who are pregnant;
(f) Counseling for insureds who are pregnant or in the
postpartum stage of pregnancy and have an increased risk of
perinatal or postpartum depression;
(g) Screening for the presence of the rhesus D antigen and
antibodies in the blood of an insured who is pregnant during the
insured’s first visit for care relating to the pregnancy;
(h) Screening for rhesus D antibodies between 24 and 28
weeks of gestation for insureds who are negative for the rhesus D
antigen and have not been exposed to blood that is positive for the
rhesus D antigen;
(i) Behavioral counseling and intervention for tobacco
cessation for insureds who are pregnant;
(j) Screening for type 2 diabetes at such intervals as
recommended by the Health Resources and Services
Administration on January 1, 2025, for insureds who are in the
postpartum stage of pregnancy and who have a history of
gestational diabetes mellitus;
(k) Counseling relating to maintaining a healthy weight for
women who are at least 40 but not more than 60 years of age and
have a body mass index greater than 18.5; and
(l) Screening for osteoporosis for women who:
(1) Are 65 years of age or older; or
(2) Are less than 65 years of age and have a risk of
fracturing a bone equal to or greater than that of a woman who is
65 years of age without any additional risk factors.
2. A society must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider
of health care who participates in the network plan of the society.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a society that
offers or issues a benefit contract shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the benefit
contract pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a benefit contract or cancel a benefit
contract solely because the person applying for or covered by the
benefit contract uses or may use any such benefit;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 51 –
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the contract or the
renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, a society may use medical management techniques,
including, without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to
determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit
required by this section or the type of provider of health care to
use for such treatment.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a benefit contract offered by a
society under which the financing and delivery of medical care,
including items and services paid for as medical care, are
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers of
health care under contract with the society. The term does not
include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 49. 1. A society that offers or issues a benefit contract
shall include in the benefit contract coverage for:
(a) Behavioral counseling and interventions to promote
physical activity and a healthy diet for insureds with
cardiovascular risk factors;
(b) Statin preventive medication for insureds who are at least
40 but not more than 75 years of age and do not have a history of
cardiovascular disease, but who have:
-
*AB522_R1*

– 52 –
(1) One or more risk factors for cardiovascular disease;
and
(2) A calculated risk of at least 10 percent of acquiring
cardiovascular disease within the next 10 years;
(c) Interventions for exercise to prevent falls for insureds who
are 65 years of age or older and reside in a medical facility or
facility for the dependent;
(d) Screenings for latent tuberculosis infection in insureds
with an increased risk of contracting tuberculosis;
(e) Screening for hypertension;
(f) One abdominal aortic screening by ultrasound to detect
abdominal aortic aneurysms for men who are at least 65 but not
more than 75 years of age and have smoked during their lifetimes;
(g) Screening for drug and alcohol misuse for insureds who
are 18 years of age or older;
(h) If an insured engages in risky or hazardous consumption
of alcohol, as determined by the screening described in paragraph
(g), behavioral counseling to reduce such behavior;
(i) Screening for lung cancer using low-dose computed
tomography for insureds who are at least 50 but not more than 80
years of age in accordance with the most recent guidelines
published by the American Cancer Society or the
recommendations of the United States Preventive Services Task
Force in effect on January 1, 2025;
(j) Screening for prediabetes and type 2 diabetes in insureds
who are at least 35 but not more than 70 years of age and have a
body mass index of 25 or greater; and
(k) Intensive behavioral interventions with multiple
components for insureds who are 18 years of age or older and
have a body mass index of 30 or greater.
2. A society must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider
of health care who participates in the network plan of the society.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a society that
offers or issues a benefit contract shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the benefit
contract pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a benefit contract or cancel a benefit
contract solely because the person applying for or covered by the
benefit contract uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 53 –
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the contract or the
renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, a society may use medical management techniques,
including, without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to
determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit
required by this section or the type of provider of health care to
use for such treatment.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Computed tomography” means the process of producing
sectional and three-dimensional images using external ionizing
radiation.
(b) “Facility for the dependent” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 449.0045.
(c) “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
(d) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(e) “Network plan” means a benefit contract offered by a
society under which the financing and delivery of medical care,
including items and services paid for as medical care, are
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers of
health care under contract with the society. The term does not
include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(f) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 50. 1. A benefit contract must provide coverage for
colorectal cancer screening in accordance with:
(a) The guidelines concerning colorectal cancer screening
which are published by the American Cancer Society; or
-
*AB522_R1*

– 54 –
(b) Other guidelines or reports concerning colorectal cancer
screening which are published by nationally recognized
professional organizations and which include current or
prevailing supporting scientific data.
2. A society must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider
of health care who participates in the network plan of the society.
3. A society that offers or issues a benefit contract shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the benefit
contract pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a benefit contract or cancel a benefit
contract solely because the person applying for or covered by the
benefit contract uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by this section, and any provision of the benefit contract
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Network plan” means a benefit contract offered by a
society under which the financing and delivery of medical care,
including items and services paid for as medical care, are
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers of
health care under contract with the society. The term does not
include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 51. 1. A society that offers or issues a benefit contract
subject to the provisions of this chapter shall include in the benefit
contract coverage for maternity care and pediatric care for
newborn infants.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 55 –
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a benefit
contract issued pursuant to this chapter may not restrict benefits
for any length of stay in a hospital in connection with childbirth
for a pregnant or postpartum individual or newborn infant
covered by the benefit contract to:
(a) Less than 48 hours after a normal vaginal delivery; and
(b) Less than 96 hours after a cesarean section.
 If a different length of stay is provided in the guidelines
established by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists, or its successor organization, and the American
Academy of Pediatrics, or its successor organization, the benefit
contract may follow such guidelines in lieu of following the length
of stay set forth above. The provisions of this subsection do not
apply to any benefit contract in any case in which the decision to
discharge the pregnant or postpartum individual or newborn
infant before the expiration of the minimum length of stay set
forth in this subsection is made by the attending physician of the
pregnant or postpartum individual or newborn infant.
3. Nothing in this section requires a pregnant or postpartum
individual to:
(a) Deliver the baby in a hospital; or
(b) Stay in a hospital for a fixed period following the birth of
the child.
4. A benefit contract may not:
(a) Deny a pregnant or postpartum individual or the newborn
infant coverage or continued coverage under the terms of the
contract if the sole purpose of the denial of coverage or continued
coverage is to avoid the requirements of this section;
(b) Provide monetary payments or rebates to a pregnant or
postpartum individual to encourage the individual to accept less
than the minimum protection available pursuant to this section;
(c) Penalize, or otherwise reduce or limit, the reimbursement
of an attending provider of health care because the attending
provider of health care provided care to a pregnant or postpartum
individual or newborn infant in accordance with the provisions of
this section;
(d) Provide incentives of any kind to an attending physician to
induce the attending physician to provide care to a pregnant or
postpartum individual or newborn infant in a manner that is
inconsistent with the provisions of this section; or
(e) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, restrict
benefits for any portion of a hospital stay required pursuant to the
provisions of this section in a manner that is less favorable than
the benefits provided for any preceding portion of that stay.
5. Nothing in this section:
-
*AB522_R1*

– 56 –
(a) Prohibits a society from imposing a deductible,
coinsurance or other mechanism for sharing costs relating to
benefits for hospital stays in connection with childbirth for a
pregnant or postpartum individual or newborn child covered by
the benefit contract, except that such coinsurance or other
mechanism for sharing costs for any portion of a hospital stay
required by this section may not be greater than the coinsurance
or other mechanism for any preceding portion of that stay.
(b) Prohibits an arrangement for payment between a society
and a provider of health care that uses capitation or other
financial incentives, if the arrangement is designed to provide
services efficiently and consistently in the best interest of the
pregnant or postpartum individual and the newborn infant.
(c) Prevents a society from negotiating with a provider of
health care concerning the level and type of reimbursement to be
provided in accordance with this section.
6. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by this section, and any provision of the contract that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
Sec. 52. NRS 695A.1844 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695A.1844 1. A society that offers or issues a benefit
contract shall include in the contract:
(a) Coverage of testing for and the treatment and prevention of
sexually transmitted diseases, including, without limitation,
Chlamydia trachomatis, gonorrhea, syphilis, human
immunodeficiency virus and hepatitis B and C, for all insureds,
regardless of age. Such coverage must include, without limitation,
the coverage required by NRS 695A.1843 and 695A.1856.
(b) Unrestricted coverage of condoms for insureds who are 13
years of age or older.
2. A society that offers or issues a benefit contract shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the benefit
contract pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a benefit contract or cancel a benefit
contract solely because the person applying for or covered by the
benefit contract uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 57 –
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
3. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after [January]
October 1, [2024,] 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the contract
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section, “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 53. NRS 695A.1853 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695A.1853 1. A society that issues a benefit contract shall
provide coverage for screening, genetic counseling and testing for
harmful mutations in the BRCA gene for women under
circumstances where such screening, genetic counseling or testing,
as applicable, is required by NRS 457.301.
2. A society shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the society.
3. A society that issues a benefit contract shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the benefit
contract pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a benefit contract or cancel a benefit
contract solely because the person applying for or covered by the
benefit contract uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
-
*AB522_R1*

– 58 –
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after [January]
October 1, [2022,] 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
[4.] 5. As used in this section:
(a) “Network plan” means a benefit contract offered by a society
under which the financing and delivery of medical care, including
items and services paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole
or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract with the
society. The term does not include an arrangement for the financing
of premiums.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 54. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 55. NRS 695A.1856 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695A.1856 1. A society that issues a benefit contract shall
provide coverage for the examination of a person who is pregnant
for the discovery of:
(a) Chlamydia trachomatis, gonorrhea, hepatitis B and hepatitis
C in accordance with NRS 442.013.
(b) Syphilis in accordance with NRS 442.010.
(c) Human immunodeficiency virus.
2. The coverage required by this section must be provided:
(a) Regardless of whether the benefits are provided to the
insured by a provider of health care, facility or medical laboratory
that participates in the network plan of the society; and
(b) Without prior authorization.
3. A society that issues a benefit contract shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the benefit
contract pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a benefit contract or cancel a benefit
contract solely because the person applying for or covered by the
benefit contract uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 59 –
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after [July]
October 1, [2021,] 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the contract
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
[4.] 5. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical laboratory” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 652.060.
(b) “Network plan” means a benefit contract offered by a society
under which the financing and delivery of medical care, including
items and services paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole
or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract with the
society. The term does not include an arrangement for the financing
of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 56. NRS 695A.1857 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695A.1857 1. A society that offers or issues a benefit
contract [that includes coverage for maternity care] shall not deny,
limit or seek reimbursement for maternity care because the insured
is acting as a gestational carrier.
2. If an insured acts as a gestational carrier, the child shall be
deemed to be a child of the intended parent, as defined in NRS
126.590, for purposes related to the benefit contract.
3. As used in this section, “gestational carrier” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 126.580.
Sec. 57. NRS 695A.1875 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695A.1875 1. A society that offers or issues a benefit
contract shall include in the contract coverage for:
(a) Counseling, support and supplies for breastfeeding,
including breastfeeding equipment, counseling and education during
the antenatal, perinatal and postpartum period for not more than 1
year;
(b) Screening and counseling for interpersonal and domestic
violence for women at least annually with initial intervention
services consisting of education, strategies to reduce harm,
supportive services or a referral for any other appropriate services;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 60 –
(c) Behavioral counseling concerning sexually transmitted
diseases from a provider of health care for sexually active [women]
insureds who are at increased risk for such diseases;
(d) Hormone replacement therapy;
(e) Such prenatal screenings and tests as recommended by the
American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists or its
successor organization;
(f) Screening for blood pressure abnormalities and diabetes,
including gestational diabetes, after at least 24 weeks of gestation or
as ordered by a provider of health care;
(g) Screening for cervical cancer at such intervals as are
recommended by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists or its successor organization;
(h) Screening for depression [;] for insureds who are 12 years
of age or older;
(i) Screening for anxiety disorders;
(j) Screening and counseling for the human immunodeficiency
virus consisting of a risk assessment, annual education relating to
prevention and at least one screening for the virus during the
lifetime of the insured or as ordered by a provider of health care;
[(j) Smoking]
(k) Tobacco cessation programs , including, without limitation,
pharmacotherapy approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration, for an insured who is 18 years of age or older ;
[consisting of not more than two cessation attempts per year and
four counseling sessions per year;
(k)] (l) All vaccinations recommended by the Advisory
Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease
Control and Prevention of the United States Department of Health
and Human Services or its successor organization; and
[(l)] (m) Such well-woman preventative visits as recommended
by the Health Resources and Services Administration [,] on
January 1, 2025, which must include at least one such visit per year
beginning at 14 years of age.
2. A society must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the society.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a society that
offers or issues a benefit contract shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the benefit contract
pursuant to subsection 1;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 61 –
(b) Refuse to issue a benefit contract or cancel a benefit contract
solely because the person applying for or covered by the contract
uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after [January]
October 1, [2018,] 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the benefit
contract or the renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
a society may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a benefit contract offered by a society
under which the financing and delivery of medical care, including
items and services paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole
or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract with the
society. The term does not include an arrangement for the financing
of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 58. NRS 695A.198 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695A.198 1. A society that issues a benefit contract shall not
discriminate against any person with respect to participation or
coverage under the contract on the basis of an actual or perceived
[gender identity or expression.] protected characteristic.
2. Prohibited discrimination includes, without limitation:
-
*AB522_R1*

– 62 –
[1.] (a) Denying, cancelling, limiting or refusing to issue or
renew a benefit contract on the basis of [the] an actual or perceived
[gender identity or expression] protected characteristic of a person
or a family member of the person;
[2.] (b) Imposing a payment or premium that is based on [the]
an actual or perceived [gender identity or expression] protected
characteristic of an insured or a family member of the insured;
[3.] (c) Designating [the] an actual or perceived [gender
identity or expression] protected characteristic of a person or a
family member of the person as grounds to deny, cancel or limit
participation or coverage; and
[4.] (d) Denying, cancelling or limiting participation or
coverage on the basis of an actual or perceived [gender identity or
expression,] protected characteristic, including, without limitation,
by limiting or denying coverage for health care services that are:
[(a)] (1) Related to gender transition, provided that there is
coverage under the contract for the services when the services are
not related to gender transition; or
[(b)] (2) Ordinarily or exclusively available to persons of any
sex.
3. As used in this section, “protected characteristic” means:
(a) Race, color, national origin, age, physical or mental
disability, sexual orientation or gender identity or expression; or
(b) Sex, including, without limitation, sex characteristics,
intersex traits and pregnancy or related conditions.
Sec. 59. Chapter 695B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 60 to 64, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 60. 1. A hospital or medical services corporation that
offers or issues a policy of health insurance which provides
coverage for dependent children shall continue to make such
coverage available for an adult child of an insured until such
child reaches 26 years of age.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a
hospital or medical services corporation to make coverage
available for a dependent of an adult child of an insured.
Sec. 61. 1. A hospital or medical services corporation that
offers or issues a policy of health insurance shall include in the
policy coverage for:
(a) Screening for anxiety for insureds who are at least 8 but
not more than 18 years of age;
(b) Assessments relating to height, weight, body mass index
and medical history for insureds who are less than 18 years of
age;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 63 –
(c) Comprehensive and intensive behavioral interventions for
insureds who are at least 12 but not more than 18 years of age and
have a body mass index in the 95th percentile or greater for
persons of the same age and sex;
(d) The application of fluoride varnish to the primary teeth for
insureds who are less than 5 years of age;
(e) Oral fluoride supplements for insureds who are at least 6
months of age but less than 5 years of age and whose supply of
water is deficient in fluoride;
(f) Counseling and education pertaining to the minimization of
exposure to ultraviolet radiation for insureds who are less than 25
years of age and the parents or legal guardians of insureds who
are less than 18 years of age for the purpose of minimizing the
risk of skin cancer in those persons;
(g) Brief behavioral counseling and interventions to prevent
tobacco use for insureds who are less than 18 years of age; and
(h) At least one screening for the detection of amblyopia or the
risk factors of amblyopia for insureds who are at least 3 but not
more than 5 years of age.
2. A hospital or medical services corporation must ensure
that the benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an
insured through a provider of health care who participates in the
network plan of the hospital or medical services corporation.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a hospital or
medical services corporation that offers or issues a policy of health
insurance shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of
health insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of health insurance or cancel a
policy of health insurance solely because the person applying for
or covered by the policy uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 64 –
4. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of
this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy
or the renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, a hospital or medical services corporation may use medical
management techniques, including, without limitation, any
available clinical evidence, to determine the frequency of or
treatment relating to any benefit required by this section or the
type of provider of health care to use for such treatment.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by a hospital or medical services corporation under which the
financing and delivery of medical care, including items and
services paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole or in part,
through a defined set of providers of health care under contract
with the hospital or medical services corporation. The term does
not include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 62. 1. A hospital or medical services corporation that
offers or issues a policy of health insurance shall include in the
policy coverage for:
(a) A daily dose of 0.4 to 0.8 milligrams of folic acid for
insureds who are pregnant or are planning on becoming
pregnant;
(b) A low dose of aspirin for the prevention of preeclampsia
for insureds who are determined to be at a high risk of that
condition after 12 weeks of gestation;
(c) Prophylactic ocular tubal medication for the prevention of
gonococcal ophthalmia in newborns;
(d) Screening for asymptomatic bacteriuria for insureds who
are pregnant;
(e) Counseling and behavioral interventions relating to the
promotion of healthy weight gain and the prevention of excessive
weight gain for insureds who are pregnant;
(f) Counseling for insureds who are pregnant or in the
postpartum stage of pregnancy and have an increased risk of
perinatal or postpartum depression;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 65 –
(g) Screening for the presence of the rhesus D antigen and
antibodies in the blood of an insured who is pregnant during the
insured’s first visit for care relating to the pregnancy;
(h) Screening for rhesus D antibodies between 24 and 28
weeks of gestation for insureds who are negative for the rhesus D
antigen and have not been exposed to blood that is positive for the
rhesus D antigen;
(i) Behavioral counseling and intervention for tobacco
cessation for insureds who are pregnant;
(j) Screening for type 2 diabetes at such intervals as
recommended by the Health Resources and Services
Administration on January 1, 2025, for insureds who are in the
postpartum stage of pregnancy and who have a history of
gestational diabetes mellitus;
(k) Counseling relating to maintaining a healthy weight for
women who are 40 but not more than 60 years of age and have a
body mass index greater than 18.5; and
(l) Screening for osteoporosis for women who:
(1) Are 65 years of age or older; or
(2) Are less than 65 years of age and have a risk of
fracturing a bone equal to or greater than that of a woman who is
65 years of age without any additional risk factors.
2. A hospital or medical services corporation must ensure
that the benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an
insured through a provider of health care who participates in the
network plan of the hospital or medical services corporation.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, hospital or
medical services corporation that offers or issues a policy of health
insurance shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of
health insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of health insurance or cancel a
policy of health insurance solely because the person applying for
or covered by the policy uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
-
*AB522_R1*

– 66 –
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of
this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy
or the renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, a hospital or medical services corporation may use medical
management techniques, including, without limitation, any
available clinical evidence, to determine the frequency of or
treatment relating to any benefit required by this section or the
type of provider of health care to use for such treatment.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by a hospital or medical services corporation under which the
financing and delivery of medical care, including items and
services paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole or in part,
through a defined set of providers of health care under contract
with the hospital or medical services corporation. The term does
not include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 63. 1. A hospital or medical services corporation that
offers or issues a policy of health insurance shall include in the
policy coverage for:
(a) Behavioral counseling and interventions to promote
physical activity and a healthy diet for insureds with
cardiovascular risk factors;
(b) Statin preventive medication for insureds who are at least
40 but not more than 75 years of age and do not have a history of
cardiovascular disease, but who have:
(1) One or more risk factors for cardiovascular disease;
and
(2) A calculated risk of at least 10 percent of acquiring
cardiovascular disease within the next 10 years;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 67 –
(c) Interventions for exercise to prevent falls for insureds who
are 65 years of age or older and reside in a medical facility or
facility for the dependent;
(d) Screenings for latent tuberculosis infection in insureds
with an increased risk of contracting tuberculosis;
(e) Screening for hypertension;
(f) One abdominal aortic screening by ultrasound to detect
abdominal aortic aneurysms for men who are at least 65 but not
more than 75 years of age and have smoked during their lifetimes;
(g) Screening for drug and alcohol misuse for insureds who
are 18 years of age or older;
(h) If an insured engages in risky or hazardous consumption
of alcohol, as determined by the screening described in paragraph
(g), behavioral counseling to reduce such behavior;
(i) Screening for lung cancer using low-dose computed
tomography for insureds who are at least 50 but not more than 80
years of age in accordance with the most recent guidelines
published by the American Cancer Society or the
recommendations of the United States Preventive Services Task
Force in effect on January 1, 2025;
(j) Screening for prediabetes and type 2 diabetes in insureds
who are at least 35 but not more than 70 years of age and have a
body mass index of 25 or greater; and
(k) Intensive behavioral interventions with multiple
components for insureds who are 18 years of age or older and
have a body mass index of 30 or greater.
2. A hospital or medical services corporation must ensure
that the benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an
insured through a provider of health care who participates in the
network plan of the hospital or medical services corporation.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a hospital or
medical services corporation that offers or issues a policy of health
insurance shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of
health insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of health insurance or cancel a
policy of health insurance solely because the person applying for
or covered by the policy uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 68 –
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of
this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy
or the renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, a hospital or medical services corporation may use medical
management techniques, including, without limitation, any
available clinical evidence, to determine the frequency of or
treatment relating to any benefit required by this section or the
type of provider of health care to use for such treatment.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Computed tomography” means the process of producing
sectional and three-dimensional images using external ionizing
radiation.
(b) “Facility for the dependent” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 449.0045.
(c) “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
(d) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(e) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by a hospital or medical services corporation under which the
financing and delivery of medical care, including items and
services paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole or in part,
through a defined set of providers of health care under contract
with the hospital or medical services corporation. The term does
not include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(f) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 64. 1. A hospital or medical services corporation that
offers or issues a policy of health insurance subject to the
-
*AB522_R1*

– 69 –
provisions of this chapter shall include in the policy coverage for
maternity care and pediatric care for newborn infants.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a policy of
health insurance issued pursuant to this chapter may not restrict
benefits for any length of stay in a hospital in connection with
childbirth for a pregnant or postpartum individual or newborn
infant covered by the policy to:
(a) Less than 48 hours after a normal vaginal delivery; and
(b) Less than 96 hours after a cesarean section.
 If a different length of stay is provided in the guidelines
established by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists, or its successor organization, and the American
Academy of Pediatrics, or its successor organization, the policy of
health insurance may follow such guidelines in lieu of following
the length of stay set forth above. The provisions of this subsection
do not apply to any policy of health insurance in any case in
which the decision to discharge the pregnant or postpartum
individual or newborn infant before the expiration of the
minimum length of stay set forth in this subsection is made by the
attending physician of the pregnant or postpartum individual or
newborn infant.
3. Nothing in this section requires a pregnant or postpartum
individual to:
(a) Deliver the baby in a hospital; or
(b) Stay in a hospital for a fixed period following the birth of
the child.
4. A policy of health insurance may not:
(a) Deny a pregnant or postpartum individual or the newborn
infant coverage or continued coverage under the terms of the
policy if the sole purpose of the denial of coverage or continued
coverage is to avoid the requirements of this section;
(b) Provide monetary payments or rebates to a pregnant or
postpartum individual to encourage the individual to accept less
than the minimum protection available pursuant to this section;
(c) Penalize, or otherwise reduce or limit, the reimbursement
of an attending provider of health care because the attending
provider of health care provided care to a pregnant or postpartum
individual or newborn infant in accordance with the provisions of
this section;
(d) Provide incentives of any kind to an attending physician to
induce the attending physician to provide care to a pregnant or
postpartum individual or newborn infant in a manner that is
inconsistent with the provisions of this section; or
(e) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, restrict
benefits for any portion of a hospital stay required pursuant to the
-
*AB522_R1*

– 70 –
provisions of this section in a manner that is less favorable than
the benefits provided for any preceding portion of that stay.
5. Nothing in this section:
(a) Prohibits a hospital or medical services corporation from
imposing a deductible, coinsurance or other mechanism for
sharing costs relating to benefits for hospital stays in connection
with childbirth for a pregnant or postpartum individual or
newborn child covered by the policy, except that such coinsurance
or other mechanism for sharing costs for any portion of a hospital
stay required by this section may not be greater than the
coinsurance or other mechanism for any preceding portion of that
stay.
(b) Prohibits an arrangement for payment between a hospital
or medical services corporation and a provider of health care that
uses capitation or other financial incentives, if the arrangement is
designed to provide services efficiently and consistently in the best
interest of the pregnant or postpartum individual and the newborn
infant.
(c) Prevents a hospital or medical services corporation from
negotiating with a provider of health care concerning the level and
type of reimbursement to be provided in accordance with this
section.
6. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of
this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by this section, and any provision of the policy
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
Sec. 65. NRS 695B.1907 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.1907 1. A policy of health insurance issued by a
hospital or medical service corporation [that provides coverage for
the treatment of colorectal cancer] must provide coverage for
colorectal cancer screening in accordance with:
(a) The guidelines concerning colorectal cancer screening which
are published by the American Cancer Society; or
(b) Other guidelines or reports concerning colorectal cancer
screening which are published by nationally recognized professional
organizations and which include current or prevailing supporting
scientific data.
2. A hospital or medical services corporation must ensure
that the benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an
insured through a provider of health care who participates in the
network plan of the hospital or medical services corporation.
3. A hospital or medical services corporation that offers or
issues a policy of health insurance shall not:
-
*AB522_R1*

– 71 –
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of
health insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of health insurance or cancel a
policy of health insurance solely because the person applying for
or covered by the policy uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, [2003,] 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by this section, and any provision of the policy
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by a hospital or medical services corporation under which the
financing and delivery of medical care, including items and
services paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole or in part,
through a defined set of providers of health care under contract
with the hospital or medical services corporation. The term does
not include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 66. NRS 695B.1911 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.1911 1. A hospital or medical services corporation that
issues a policy of health insurance shall provide coverage for
screening, genetic counseling and testing for harmful mutations in
the BRCA gene for women under circumstances where such
screening, genetic counseling or testing, as applicable, is required by
NRS 457.301.
2. A hospital or medical services corporation shall ensure that
the benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an
-
*AB522_R1*

– 72 –
insured through a provider of health care who participates in the
network plan of the hospital or medical services corporation.
3. A hospital or medical services corporation that issues a
policy of health insurance shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of
health insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of health insurance or cancel a
policy of health insurance solely because the person applying for
or covered by the policy uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
[January] October 1, [2022,] 2025, has the legal effect of including
the coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the
policy that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
[4.] 5. As used in this section:
(a) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by a hospital or medical services corporation under which the
financing and delivery of medical care, including items and services
paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a
defined set of providers under contract with the hospital or medical
services corporation. The term does not include an arrangement for
the financing of premiums.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 67. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 68. NRS 695B.1913 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.1913 1. A hospital or medical services corporation that
issues a policy of health insurance shall provide coverage for the
examination of a person who is pregnant for the discovery of:
-
*AB522_R1*

– 73 –
(a) Chlamydia trachomatis, gonorrhea, hepatitis B and hepatitis
C in accordance with NRS 442.013.
(b) Syphilis in accordance with NRS 442.010.
(c) Human immunodeficiency virus.
2. The coverage required by this section must be provided:
(a) Regardless of whether the benefits are provided to the
insured by a provider of health care, facility or medical laboratory
that participates in the network plan of the hospital or medical
services corporation; and
(b) Without prior authorization.
3. A hospital or medical services corporation that issues a
policy of health insurance shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of
health insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of health insurance or cancel a
policy of health insurance solely because the person applying for
or covered by the policy uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
[July] October 1, [2021,] 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
[4.] 5. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical laboratory” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 652.060.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by a hospital or medical services corporation under which the
financing and delivery of medical care, including items and services
paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a
defined set of providers under contract with the hospital or medical
-
*AB522_R1*

– 74 –
services corporation. The term does not include an arrangement for
the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 69. NRS 695B.19195 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.19195 1. An insurer that offers or issues a contract for
hospital or medical service shall include in the contract coverage
for:
(a) Counseling, support and supplies for breastfeeding,
including breastfeeding equipment, counseling and education during
the antenatal, perinatal and postpartum period for not more than 1
year;
(b) Screening and counseling for interpersonal and domestic
violence for women at least annually with initial intervention
services consisting of education, strategies to reduce harm,
supportive services or a referral for any other appropriate services;
(c) Behavioral counseling concerning sexually transmitted
diseases from a provider of health care for sexually active [women]
insureds who are at increased risk for such diseases;
(d) Such prenatal screenings and tests as recommended by the
American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists or its
successor organization;
(e) Screening for blood pressure abnormalities and diabetes,
including gestational diabetes, after at least 24 weeks of gestation or
as ordered by a provider of health care;
(f) Screening for cervical cancer at such intervals as are
recommended by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists or its successor organization;
(g) Screening for depression [;] for insureds who are 12 years
of age or older;
(h) Screening for anxiety disorders;
(i) Screening and counseling for the human immunodeficiency
virus consisting of a risk assessment, annual education relating to
prevention and at least one screening for the virus during the
lifetime of the insured or as ordered by a provider of health care;
[(i) Smoking]
(j) Tobacco cessation programs , including, without limitation,
pharmacotherapy approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration, for an insured who is 18 years of age or older ;
[consisting of not more than two cessation attempts per year and
four counseling sessions per year;
(j)] (k) All vaccinations recommended by the Advisory
Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease
-
*AB522_R1*

– 75 –
Control and Prevention of the United States Department of Health
and Human Services or its successor organization; and
[(k)] (l) Such well-woman preventative visits as recommended
by the Health Resources and Services Administration [,] on
January 1, 2025, which must include at least one such visit per year
beginning at 14 years of age.
2. An insurer must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, an insurer that
offers or issues a contract for hospital or medical service shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the contract for
hospital or medical service pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a contract for hospital or medical service or
cancel a contract for hospital or medical service solely because the
person applying for or covered by the contract uses or may use any
such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A contract for hospital or medical service subject to the
provisions of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or
renewed on or after [January] October 1, [2018,] 2025, has the legal
effect of including the coverage required by subsection 1, and any
provision of the contract or the renewal which is in conflict with this
section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
an insurer may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
-
*AB522_R1*

– 76 –
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a contract for hospital or medical
service offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery
of medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers under contract with the insurer. The term does not include
an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 70. NRS 695B.1926 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.1926 1. A hospital or medical services corporation that
offers or issues a policy of health insurance shall include in the
policy:
(a) Coverage of testing for and the treatment and prevention of
sexually transmitted diseases, including, without limitation,
Chlamydia trachomatis, gonorrhea, syphilis, human
immunodeficiency virus and hepatitis B and C, for all insureds,
regardless of age. Such coverage must include, without limitation,
the coverage required by NRS 695B.1913 and 695B.1924.
(b) Unrestricted coverage of condoms for insureds who are 13
years of age or older.
2. A hospital or medical services corporation that offers or
issues a policy of health insurance shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the policy of
health insurance pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of health insurance or cancel a
policy of health insurance solely because the person applying for
or covered by the policy uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 77 –
3. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
[January] October 1, [2024,] 2025, has the legal effect of including
the coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the
policy that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 71. NRS 695B.1948 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.1948 1. An insurer that offers or issues a contract for
hospital or medical services [that includes coverage for maternity
care] shall not deny, limit or seek reimbursement for maternity care
because the insured is acting as a gestational carrier.
2. If an insured acts as a gestational carrier, the child shall be
deemed to be a child of the intended parent, as defined in NRS
126.590, for purposes related to the contract for hospital or medical
services.
3. As used in this section, “gestational carrier” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 126.580.
Sec. 72. NRS 695B.3167 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.3167 1. A hospital or medical services corporation that
issues a policy of health insurance shall not discriminate against any
person with respect to participation or coverage under the policy on
the basis of an actual or perceived [gender identity or expression.]
protected characteristic.
2. Prohibited discrimination includes, without limitation:
[1.] (a) Denying, cancelling, limiting or refusing to issue or
renew a policy of health insurance on the basis of [the] an actual or
perceived [gender identity or expression] protected characteristic of
a person or a family member of the person;
[2.] (b) Imposing a payment or premium that is based on [the]
an actual or perceived [gender identity or expression] protected
characteristic of an insured or a family member of the insured;
[3.] (c) Designating [the] an actual or perceived [gender
identity or expression] protected characteristic of a person or a
family member of the person as grounds to deny, cancel or limit
participation or coverage; and
[4.] (d) Denying, cancelling or limiting participation or
coverage on the basis of an actual or perceived [gender identity or
expression,] protected characteristic including, without limitation,
by limiting or denying coverage for health care services that are:
[(a)] (1) Related to gender transition, provided that there is
coverage under the policy for the services when the services are not
related to gender transition; or
-
*AB522_R1*

– 78 –
[(b)] (2) Ordinarily or exclusively available to persons of any
sex.
3. As used in this section, “protected characteristic” means:
(a) Race, color, national origin, age, physical or mental
disability, sexual orientation or gender identity or expression; or
(b) Sex, including, without limitation, sex characteristics,
intersex traits and pregnancy or related conditions.
Sec. 73. Chapter 695C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 74 to 78, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 74. 1. A health maintenance organization that offers
or issues a health care plan which provides coverage for
dependent children shall continue to make such coverage
available for an adult child of an enrollee until such child reaches
26 years of age.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a
health maintenance organization to make coverage available for a
dependent of an adult child of an enrollee.
Sec. 75. 1. A health maintenance organization that offers
or issues a health care plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) Screening for anxiety for enrollees who are at least 8 but
not more than 18 years of age;
(b) Assessments relating to height, weight, body mass index
and medical history for enrollees who are less than 18 years of
age;
(c) Comprehensive and intensive behavioral interventions for
enrollees who are at least 12 but not more than 18 years of age
and have a body mass index in the 95th percentile or greater for
persons of the same age and sex;
(d) The application of fluoride varnish to the primary teeth for
enrollees who are less than 5 years of age;
(e) Oral fluoride supplements for enrollees who are at least 6
months of age but less than 5 years of age and whose supply of
water is deficient in fluoride;
(f) Counseling and education pertaining to the minimization of
exposure to ultraviolet radiation for enrollees who are less than 25
years of age and the parents or legal guardians of enrollees who
are less than 18 years of age for the purpose of minimizing the
risk of skin cancer in those persons;
(g) Brief behavioral counseling and interventions to prevent
tobacco use for enrollees who are less than 18 years of age; and
(h) At least one screening for the detection of amblyopia or the
risk factors of amblyopia for enrollees who are at least 3 but not
more than 5 years of age.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 79 –
2. A health maintenance organization must ensure that the
benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an enrollee
through a provider of health care who participates in the network
plan of the health maintenance organization.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a health
maintenance organization that offers or issues a health care plan
shall not:
(a) Require an enrollee to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health care
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care
plan solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan
uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an enrollee to discourage the enrollee from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an enrollee, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
enrollee; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
enrollee to any such benefit.
4. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan or the
renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, a health maintenance organization may use medical
management techniques, including, without limitation, any
available clinical evidence, to determine the frequency of or
treatment relating to any benefit required by this section or the
type of provider of health care to use for such treatment.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
health maintenance organization under which the financing and
-
*AB522_R1*

– 80 –
delivery of medical care, including items and services paid for as
medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined
set of providers of health care under contract with the health
maintenance organization. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 76. 1. A health maintenance organization that offers
or issues a health care plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) A daily dose of 0.4 to 0.8 milligrams of folic acid for
enrollees who are pregnant or are planning on becoming
pregnant;
(b) A low dose of aspirin for the prevention of preeclampsia
for enrollees who are determined to be at a high risk of that
condition after 12 weeks of gestation;
(c) Prophylactic ocular tubal medication for the prevention of
gonococcal ophthalmia in newborns;
(d) Screening for asymptomatic bacteriuria for enrollees who
are pregnant;
(e) Counseling and behavioral interventions relating to the
promotion of healthy weight gain and the prevention of excessive
weight gain for enrollees who are pregnant;
(f) Counseling for enrollees who are pregnant or in the
postpartum stage of pregnancy and have an increased risk of
perinatal or postpartum depression;
(g) Screening for the presence of the rhesus D antigen and
antibodies in the blood of an enrollee who is pregnant during the
enrollee’s first visit for care relating to the pregnancy;
(h) Screening for rhesus D antibodies between 24 and 28
weeks of gestation for enrollees who are negative for the rhesus D
antigen and have not been exposed to blood that is positive for the
rhesus D antigen;
(i) Behavioral counseling and intervention for tobacco
cessation for enrollees who are pregnant;
(j) Screening for type 2 diabetes at such intervals as
recommended by the Health Resources and Services
Administration on January 1, 2025, for enrollees who are in the
postpartum stage of pregnancy and who have a history of
gestational diabetes mellitus;
(k) Counseling relating to maintaining a healthy weight for
women who are at least 40 but not more than 60 years of age and
have a body mass index greater than 18.5; and
(l) Screening for osteoporosis for women who:
(1) Are 65 years of age or older; or
-
*AB522_R1*

– 81 –
(2) Are less than 65 years of age and have a risk of
fracturing a bone equal to or greater than that of a woman who is
65 years of age without any additional risk factors.
2. A health maintenance organization must ensure that the
benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an enrollee
through a provider of health care who participates in the network
plan of the health maintenance organization.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a health
maintenance organization that offers or issues a health care plan
shall not:
(a) Require an enrollee to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health care
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care
plan solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan
uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an enrollee to discourage the enrollee from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an enrollee, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
enrollee; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
enrollee to any such benefit.
4. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan or the
renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, a health maintenance organization may use medical
management techniques, including, without limitation, any
available clinical evidence, to determine the frequency of or
treatment relating to any benefit required by this section or the
type of provider of health care to use for such treatment.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
-
*AB522_R1*

– 82 –
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
health maintenance organization under which the financing and
delivery of medical care, including items and services paid for as
medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined
set of providers of health care under contract with the health
maintenance organization. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 77. 1. A health maintenance organization that offers
or issues a health care plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) Behavioral counseling and interventions to promote
physical activity and a healthy diet for enrollees with
cardiovascular risk factors;
(b) Statin preventive medication for enrollees who are at least
40 but not more than 75 years of age and do not have a history of
cardiovascular disease, but who have:
(1) One or more risk factors for cardiovascular disease;
and
(2) A calculated risk of at least 10 percent of acquiring
cardiovascular disease within the next 10 years;
(c) Interventions for exercise to prevent falls for enrollees who
are 65 years of age or older and reside in a medical facility or
facility for the dependent;
(d) Screenings for latent tuberculosis infection in enrollees
with an increased risk of contracting tuberculosis;
(e) Screening for hypertension;
(f) One abdominal aortic screening by ultrasound to detect
abdominal aortic aneurysms for men who are at least 65 but not
more than 75 years of age and have smoked during their lifetimes;
(g) Screening for drug and alcohol misuse for enrollees who
are 18 years of age or older;
(h) If an enrollee engages in risky or hazardous consumption
of alcohol, as determined by the screening described in paragraph
(g), behavioral counseling to reduce such behavior;
(i) Screening for lung cancer using low-dose computed
tomography for enrollees who are at least 50 but not more than 80
years of age in accordance with the most recent guidelines
published by the American Cancer Society or the
recommendations of the United States Preventive Services Task
Force in effect on January 1, 2025;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 83 –
(j) Screening for prediabetes and type 2 diabetes in enrollees
who are at least 35 but not more than 70 years of age and have a
body mass index of 25 or greater; and
(k) Intensive behavioral interventions with multiple
components for enrollees who are 18 years of age or older and
have a body mass index of 30 or greater.
2. A health maintenance organization must ensure that the
benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an enrollee
through a provider of health care who participates in the network
plan of the health maintenance organization.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a health
maintenance organization that offers or issues a health care plan
shall not:
(a) Require an enrollee to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health care
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care
plan solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan
uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an enrollee to discourage the enrollee from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an enrollee, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
enrollee; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
enrollee to any such benefit.
4. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan or the
renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, a health maintenance organization may use medical
management techniques, including, without limitation, any
available clinical evidence, to determine the frequency of or
treatment relating to any benefit required by this section or the
type of provider of health care to use for such treatment.
6. As used in this section:
-
*AB522_R1*

– 84 –
(a) “Computed tomography” means the process of producing
sectional and three-dimensional images using external ionizing
radiation.
(b) “Facility for the dependent” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 449.0045.
(c) “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
(d) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(e) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
health maintenance organization under which the financing and
delivery of medical care, including items and services paid for as
medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined
set of providers of health care under contract with the health
maintenance organization. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(f) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 78. 1. A health maintenance organization that offers
or issues a health care plan subject to the provisions of this
chapter shall include in the health care plan coverage for
maternity care and pediatric care for newborn infants.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a health
care plan issued pursuant to this chapter may not restrict benefits
for any length of stay in a hospital in connection with childbirth
for a pregnant or postpartum individual or newborn infant
covered by the plan to:
(a) Less than 48 hours after a normal vaginal delivery; and
(b) Less than 96 hours after a cesarean section.
 If a different length of stay is provided in the guidelines
established by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists, or its successor organization, and the American
Academy of Pediatrics, or its successor organization, the health
care plan may follow such guidelines in lieu of following the
length of stay set forth above. The provisions of this subsection do
not apply to any health care plan in any case in which the decision
to discharge the pregnant or postpartum individual or newborn
infant before the expiration of the minimum length of stay set
forth in this subsection is made by the attending physician of the
pregnant or postpartum individual or newborn infant.
3. Nothing in this section requires a pregnant or postpartum
individual to:
-
*AB522_R1*

– 85 –
(a) Deliver the baby in a hospital; or
(b) Stay in a hospital for a fixed period following the birth of
the child.
4. A health care plan may not:
(a) Deny a pregnant or postpartum individual or the newborn
infant coverage or continued coverage under the terms of the plan
if the sole purpose of the denial of coverage or continued coverage
is to avoid the requirements of this section;
(b) Provide monetary payments or rebates to a pregnant or
postpartum individual to encourage the individual to accept less
than the minimum protection available pursuant to this section;
(c) Penalize, or otherwise reduce or limit, the reimbursement
of an attending provider of health care because the attending
provider of health care provided care to a pregnant or postpartum
individual or newborn infant in accordance with the provisions of
this section;
(d) Provide incentives of any kind to an attending physician to
induce the attending physician to provide care to a pregnant or
postpartum individual or newborn infant in a manner that is
inconsistent with the provisions of this section; or
(e) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, restrict
benefits for any portion of a hospital stay required pursuant to the
provisions of this section in a manner that is less favorable than
the benefits provided for any preceding portion of that stay.
5. Nothing in this section:
(a) Prohibits a health maintenance organization from
imposing a deductible, coinsurance or other mechanism for
sharing costs relating to benefits for hospital stays in connection
with childbirth for a pregnant or postpartum individual or
newborn child covered by the plan, except that such coinsurance
or other mechanism for sharing costs for any portion of a hospital
stay required by this section may not be greater than the
coinsurance or other mechanism for any preceding portion of that
stay.
(b) Prohibits an arrangement for payment between a health
maintenance organization and a provider of health care that uses
capitation or other financial incentives, if the arrangement is
designed to provide services efficiently and consistently in the best
interest of the pregnant or postpartum individual and the newborn
infant.
(c) Prevents a health maintenance organization from
negotiating with a provider of health care concerning the level and
type of reimbursement to be provided in accordance with this
section.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 86 –
6. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by this section, and any provision of the plan that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
Sec. 79. NRS 695C.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695C.050 1. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or
in specific provisions of this title, the provisions of this title are not
applicable to any health maintenance organization granted a
certificate of authority under this chapter. This provision does not
apply to an insurer licensed and regulated pursuant to this title
except with respect to its activities as a health maintenance
organization authorized and regulated pursuant to this chapter.
2. Solicitation of enrollees by a health maintenance
organization granted a certificate of authority, or its representatives,
must not be construed to violate any provision of law relating to
solicitation or advertising by practitioners of a healing art.
3. Any health maintenance organization authorized under this
chapter shall not be deemed to be practicing medicine and is exempt
from the provisions of chapter 630 of NRS.
4. The provisions of NRS 695C.110, 695C.125, 695C.1691,
695C.1693, 695C.170, 695C.1703, 695C.1705, 695C.1709 to
695C.173, inclusive, 695C.1733, 695C.17335, 695C.1734,
695C.1751, 695C.1755, 695C.1759, 695C.176 to 695C.200,
inclusive, and 695C.265 do not apply to a health maintenance
organization that provides health care services through managed
care to recipients of Medicaid under the State Plan for Medicaid or
insurance pursuant to the Children’s Health Insurance Program
pursuant to a contract with the Division of Health Care Financing
and Policy of the Department of Health and Human Services. This
subsection does not exempt a health maintenance organization from
any provision of this chapter for services provided pursuant to any
other contract.
5. The provisions of NRS 695C.16932 to 695C.1699,
inclusive, 695C.1701, 695C.1708, 695C.1728, 695C.1731,
695C.17333, 695C.17345, 695C.17347, 695C.1736 to 695C.1745,
inclusive, 695C.1757 and 695C.204 and sections 74 to 78,
inclusive, of this act apply to a health maintenance organization that
provides health care services through managed care to recipients of
Medicaid under the State Plan for Medicaid.
6. The provisions of NRS 695C.17095 do not apply to a health
maintenance organization that provides health care services to
members of the Public Employees’ Benefits Program. This
subsection does not exempt a health maintenance organization from
-
*AB522_R1*

– 87 –
any provision of this chapter for services provided pursuant to any
other contract.
7. The provisions of NRS 695C.1735 do not apply to a health
maintenance organization that provides health care services to:
(a) The officers and employees, and the dependents of officers
and employees, of the governing body of any county, school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of this State; or
(b) Members of the Public Employees’ Benefits Program.
 This subsection does not exempt a health maintenance
organization from any provision of this chapter for services
provided pursuant to any other contract.
Sec. 80. NRS 695C.1698 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.1698 1. A health maintenance organization that offers
or issues a health care plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) Counseling, support and supplies for breastfeeding,
including breastfeeding equipment, counseling and education during
the antenatal, perinatal and postpartum period for not more than 1
year;
(b) Screening and counseling for interpersonal and domestic
violence for women at least annually with initial intervention
services consisting of education, strategies to reduce harm,
supportive services or a referral for any other appropriate services;
(c) Behavioral counseling concerning sexually transmitted
diseases from a provider of health care for sexually active [women]
enrollees who are at increased risk for such diseases;
(d) Such prenatal screenings and tests as recommended by the
American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists or its
successor organization;
(e) Screening for blood pressure abnormalities and diabetes,
including gestational diabetes, after at least 24 weeks of gestation or
as ordered by a provider of health care;
(f) Screening for cervical cancer at such intervals as are
recommended by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists or its successor organization;
(g) Screening for depression [;] for enrollees who are 12 years
of age or older;
(h) Screening for anxiety disorders;
(i) Screening and counseling for the human immunodeficiency
virus consisting of a risk assessment, annual education relating to
prevention and at least one screening for the virus during the
lifetime of the enrollee or as ordered by a provider of health care;
[(i) Smoking]
-
*AB522_R1*

– 88 –
(j) Tobacco cessation programs , including, without limitation,
pharmacotherapy approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration, for an enrollee who is 18 years of age or older ;
[not more than two cessation attempts per year and four counseling
sessions per year;
(j)] (k) All vaccinations recommended by the Advisory
Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease
Control and Prevention of the United States Department of Health
and Human Services or its successor organization; and
[(k)] (l) Such well-woman preventative visits as recommended
by the Health Resources and Services Administration [,] on
January 1, 2025, which must include at least one such visit per year
beginning at 14 years of age.
2. A health maintenance organization must ensure that the
benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an enrollee
through a provider of health care who participates in the network
plan of the health maintenance organization.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a health
maintenance organization that offers or issues a health care plan
shall not:
(a) Require an enrollee to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health care plan
pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care plan
solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan uses
or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an enrollee to discourage the enrollee from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an enrollee, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an enrollee; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
enrollee to any such benefit.
4. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after [January]
October 1, [2018,] 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan or
the renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
a health maintenance organization may use medical management
-
*AB522_R1*

– 89 –
techniques, including, without limitation, any available clinical
evidence, to determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any
benefit required by this section or the type of provider of health care
to use for such treatment.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a health
maintenance organization under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the health maintenance organization. The term
does not include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 81. NRS 695C.1712 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.1712 1. A health maintenance organization that offers
or issues a health care plan [that includes coverage for maternity
care] shall not deny, limit or seek reimbursement for maternity care
because the enrollee is acting as a gestational carrier.
2. If an enrollee acts as a gestational carrier, the child shall be
deemed to be a child of the intended parent, as defined in NRS
126.590, for purposes related to the health care plan.
3. As used in this section, “gestational carrier” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 126.580.
Sec. 82. NRS 695C.1731 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.1731 1. A health care plan issued by a health
maintenance organization [that provides coverage for the treatment
of colorectal cancer] must provide coverage for colorectal cancer
screening in accordance with:
(a) The guidelines concerning colorectal cancer screening which
are published by the American Cancer Society; or
(b) Other guidelines or reports concerning colorectal cancer
screening which are published by nationally recognized professional
organizations and which include current or prevailing supporting
scientific data.
2. A health maintenance organization must ensure that the
benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an enrollee
through a provider of health care who participates in the network
plan of the health maintenance organization.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 90 –
3. A health maintenance organization that offers or issues a
health care plan shall not:
(a) Require an enrollee to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health care
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care
plan solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan
uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an enrollee to discourage the enrollee from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an enrollee, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
enrollee; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
enrollee to any such benefit.
4. An evidence of coverage for a health care plan subject to the
provisions of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or
renewed on or after October 1, [2003,] 2025, has the legal effect of
including the coverage required by this section, and any provision of
the evidence of coverage that conflicts with the provisions of this
section is void.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
health maintenance organization under which the financing and
delivery of medical care, including items and services paid for as
medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined
set of providers of health care under contract with the health
maintenance organization. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 83. NRS 695C.17347 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.17347 1. A health maintenance organization that issues
a health care plan shall provide coverage for screening, genetic
counseling and testing for harmful mutations in the BRCA gene for
women under circumstances where such screening, genetic
counseling or testing, as applicable, is required by NRS 457.301.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 91 –
2. A health maintenance organization shall ensure that the
benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an enrollee
through a provider of health care who participates in the network
plan of the health maintenance organization.
3. A health maintenance organization that issues a health
care plan shall not:
(a) Require an enrollee to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health care
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care
plan solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan
uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an enrollee to discourage the enrollee from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an enrollee, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
enrollee; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
enrollee to any such benefit.
4. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after [January]
October 1, [2022,] 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
[4.] 5. As used in this section:
(a) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a health
maintenance organization under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the health maintenance organization. The term
does not include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 84. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 85. NRS 695C.1736 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.1736 1. A health maintenance organization that offers
or issues a health care plan shall include in the plan:
-
*AB522_R1*

– 92 –
(a) Coverage of testing for and the treatment and prevention of
sexually transmitted diseases, including, without limitation,
Chlamydia trachomatis, gonorrhea, syphilis, human
immunodeficiency virus and hepatitis B and C, for all enrollees,
regardless of age. Such coverage must include, without limitation,
the coverage required by NRS 695C.1737 and 695C.1743.
(b) Unrestricted coverage of condoms for enrollees who are 13
years of age or older.
2. A health maintenance organization that offers or issues a
health care plan shall not:
(a) Require an enrollee to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health care
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care
plan solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan
uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an enrollee to discourage the enrollee from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an enrollee, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
enrollee; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
enrollee to any such benefit.
3. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after [January]
October 1, [2024,] 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section, “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 86. NRS 695C.1737 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.1737 1. A health maintenance organization that issues
a health care plan shall provide coverage for the examination of a
person who is pregnant for the discovery of:
(a) Chlamydia trachomatis, gonorrhea, hepatitis B and hepatitis
C in accordance with NRS 442.013.
(b) Syphilis in accordance with NRS 442.010.
(c) Human immunodeficiency virus.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 93 –
2. The coverage required by this section must be provided:
(a) Regardless of whether the benefits are provided to the
enrollee by a provider of health care, facility or medical laboratory
that participates in the network plan of the health maintenance
organization; and
(b) Without prior authorization.
3. A health maintenance organization that issues a health
care plan shall not:
(a) Require an enrollee to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health care
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care
plan solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan
uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an enrollee to discourage the enrollee from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an enrollee, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
enrollee; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
enrollee to any such benefit.
4. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after [July]
October 1, [2021,] 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
[4.] 5. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical laboratory” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 652.060.
(b) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a health
maintenance organization under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the health maintenance organization. The term
does not include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 94 –
Sec. 87. NRS 695C.204 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695C.204 1. A health maintenance organization that issues a
health care plan shall not discriminate against any person with
respect to participation or coverage under the plan on the basis of an
actual or perceived [gender identity or expression.] protected
characteristic.
2. Prohibited discrimination includes, without limitation:
[1.] (a) Denying, cancelling, limiting or refusing to issue or
renew a health care plan on the basis of [the] an actual or perceived
[gender identity or expression] protected characteristic of a person
or a family member of the person;
[2.] (b) Imposing a payment or premium that is based on [the]
an actual or perceived [gender identity or expression] protected
characteristic of an enrollee or a family member of the enrollee;
[3.] (c) Designating [the] an actual or perceived [gender
identity or expression] protected characteristic of a person or a
family member of the person as grounds to deny, cancel or limit
participation or coverage; and
[4.] (d) Denying, cancelling or limiting participation or
coverage on the basis of an actual or perceived [gender identity or
expression,] protected characteristic, including, without limitation,
by limiting or denying coverage for health care services that are:
[(a)] (1) Related to gender transition, provided that there is
coverage under the plan for the services when the services are not
related to gender transition; or
[(b)] (2) Ordinarily or exclusively available to persons of any
sex.
3. As used in this section, “protected characteristic” means:
(a) Race, color, national origin, age, physical or mental
disability, sexual orientation or gender identity or expression; or
(b) Sex, including, without limitation, sex characteristics,
intersex traits and pregnancy or related conditions.
Sec. 88. NRS 695C.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695C.330 1. The Commissioner may suspend or revoke any
certificate of authority issued to a health maintenance organization
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter if the Commissioner finds
that any of the following conditions exist:
(a) The health maintenance organization is operating
significantly in contravention of its basic organizational document,
its health care plan or in a manner contrary to that described in and
reasonably inferred from any other information submitted pursuant
to NRS 695C.060, 695C.070 and 695C.140, unless any amendments
to those submissions have been filed with and approved by the
Commissioner;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 95 –
(b) The health maintenance organization issues evidence of
coverage or uses a schedule of charges for health care services
which do not comply with the requirements of NRS 695C.1691 to
695C.200, inclusive, and sections 74 to 78, inclusive, of this act,
695C.204 or 695C.207;
(c) The health care plan does not furnish comprehensive health
care services as provided for in NRS 695C.060;
(d) The Commissioner certifies that the health maintenance
organization:
(1) Does not meet the requirements of subsection 1 of NRS
695C.080; or
(2) Is unable to fulfill its obligations to furnish health care
services as required under its health care plan;
(e) The health maintenance organization is no longer financially
responsible and may reasonably be expected to be unable to meet its
obligations to enrollees or prospective enrollees;
(f) The health maintenance organization has failed to put into
effect a mechanism affording the enrollees an opportunity to
participate in matters relating to the content of programs pursuant to
NRS 695C.110;
(g) The health maintenance organization has failed to put into
effect the system required by NRS 695C.260 for:
(1) Resolving complaints in a manner reasonably to dispose
of valid complaints; and
(2) Conducting external reviews of adverse determinations
that comply with the provisions of NRS 695G.241 to 695G.310,
inclusive;
(h) The health maintenance organization or any person on its
behalf has advertised or merchandised its services in an untrue,
misrepresentative, misleading, deceptive or unfair manner;
(i) The continued operation of the health maintenance
organization would be hazardous to its enrollees or creditors or to
the general public;
(j) The health maintenance organization fails to provide the
coverage required by NRS 695C.1691; or
(k) The health maintenance organization has otherwise failed to
comply substantially with the provisions of this chapter.
2. A certificate of authority must be suspended or revoked only
after compliance with the requirements of NRS 695C.340.
3. If the certificate of authority of a health maintenance
organization is suspended, the health maintenance organization shall
not, during the period of that suspension, enroll any additional
groups or new individual contracts, unless those groups or persons
were contracted for before the date of suspension.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 96 –
4. If the certificate of authority of a health maintenance
organization is revoked, the organization shall proceed, immediately
following the effective date of the order of revocation, to wind up its
affairs and shall conduct no further business except as may be
essential to the orderly conclusion of the affairs of the organization.
It shall engage in no further advertising or solicitation of any kind.
The Commissioner may, by written order, permit such further
operation of the organization as the Commissioner may find to be in
the best interest of enrollees to the end that enrollees are afforded
the greatest practical opportunity to obtain continuing coverage for
health care.
Sec. 89. Chapter 695G of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 90 to 94, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 90. 1. A managed care organization that offers or
issues a health care plan which provides coverage for dependent
children shall continue to make such coverage available for an
adult child of an insured until such child reaches 26 years of age.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a
managed care organization to make coverage available for a
dependent of an adult child of an insured.
Sec. 91. 1. A managed care organization that offers or
issues a health care plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) Screening for anxiety for insureds who are at least 8 but
not more than 18 years of age;
(b) Assessments relating to height, weight, body mass index
and medical history for insureds who are less than 18 years of
age;
(c) Comprehensive and intensive behavioral interventions for
insureds who are at least 12 but not more than 18 years of age and
have a body mass index in the 95th percentile or greater for
persons of the same age and sex;
(d) The application of fluoride varnish to the primary teeth for
insureds who are less than 5 years of age;
(e) Oral fluoride supplements for insureds who are at least 6
months of age but less than 5 years of age and whose supply of
water is deficient in fluoride;
(f) Counseling and education pertaining to the minimization of
exposure to ultraviolet radiation for insureds who are less than 25
years of age and the parents or legal guardians of insureds who
are less than 18 years of age for the purpose of minimizing the
risk of skin cancer in those persons;
(g) Brief behavioral counseling and interventions to prevent
tobacco use for insureds who are less than 18 years of age; and
-
*AB522_R1*

– 97 –
(h) At least one screening for the detection of amblyopia or the
risk factors of amblyopia for insureds who are at least 3 but not
more than 5 years of age.
2. A managed care organization must ensure that the benefits
required by subsection 1 are made available to an insured through
a provider of health care who participates in the network plan of
the managed care organization.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a managed
care organization that offers or issues a health care plan shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health care
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care
plan solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan
uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan or the
renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, a managed care organization may use medical management
techniques, including, without limitation, any available clinical
evidence, to determine the frequency of or treatment relating to
any benefit required by this section or the type of provider of
health care to use for such treatment.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 98 –
(b) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
managed care organization under which the financing and
delivery of medical care, including items and services paid for as
medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined
set of providers of health care under contract with the managed
care organization. The term does not include an arrangement for
the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 92. 1. A managed care organization that offers or
issues a health care plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) A daily dose of 0.4 to 0.8 milligrams of folic acid for
insureds who are pregnant or are planning on becoming
pregnant;
(b) A low dose of aspirin for the prevention of preeclampsia
for insureds who are determined to be at a high risk of that
condition after 12 weeks of gestation;
(c) Prophylactic ocular tubal medication for the prevention of
gonococcal ophthalmia in newborns;
(d) Screening for asymptomatic bacteriuria for insureds who
are pregnant;
(e) Counseling and behavioral interventions relating to the
promotion of healthy weight gain and the prevention of excessive
weight gain for insureds who are pregnant;
(f) Counseling for insureds who are pregnant or in the
postpartum stage of pregnancy and have an increased risk of
perinatal or postpartum depression;
(g) Screening for the presence of the rhesus D antigen and
antibodies in the blood of an insured who is pregnant during the
insured’s first visit for care relating to the pregnancy;
(h) Screening for rhesus D antibodies between 24 and 28
weeks of gestation for insureds who are negative for the rhesus D
antigen and have not been exposed to blood that is positive for the
rhesus D antigen;
(i) Behavioral counseling and intervention for tobacco
cessation for insureds who are pregnant;
(j) Screening for type 2 diabetes at such intervals as
recommended by the Health Resources and Services
Administration on January 1, 2025, for insureds who are in the
postpartum stage of pregnancy and who have a history of
gestational diabetes mellitus;
(k) Counseling relating to maintaining a healthy weight for
women who are at least 40 but not more than 60 years of age and
have a body mass index greater than 18.5; and
(l) Screening for osteoporosis for women who:
-
*AB522_R1*

– 99 –
(1) Are 65 years of age or older; or
(2) Are less than 65 years of age and have a risk of
fracturing a bone equal to or greater than that of a woman who is
65 years of age without any additional risk factors.
2. A managed care organization must ensure that the benefits
required by subsection 1 are made available to an insured through
a provider of health care who participates in the network plan of
the managed care organization.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a managed
care organization that offers or issues a health care plan shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health care
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care
plan solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan
uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan or the
renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, a managed care organization may use medical management
techniques, including, without limitation, any available clinical
evidence, to determine the frequency of or treatment relating to
any benefit required by this section or the type of provider of
health care to use for such treatment.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
-
*AB522_R1*

– 100 –
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
managed care organization under which the financing and
delivery of medical care, including items and services paid for as
medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined
set of providers of health care under contract with the managed
care organization. The term does not include an arrangement for
the financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 93. 1. A managed care organization that offers or
issues a health care plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) Behavioral counseling and interventions to promote
physical activity and a healthy diet for insureds with
cardiovascular risk factors;
(b) Statin preventive medication for insureds who are at least
40 but not more than 75 years of age and do not have a history of
cardiovascular disease, but who have:
(1) One or more risk factors for cardiovascular disease;
and
(2) A calculated risk of at least 10 percent of acquiring
cardiovascular disease within the next 10 years;
(c) Interventions for exercise to prevent falls for insureds who
are 65 years of age or older and reside in a medical facility or
facility for the dependent;
(d) Screenings for latent tuberculosis infection in insureds
with an increased risk of contracting tuberculosis;
(e) Screening for hypertension;
(f) One abdominal aortic screening by ultrasound to detect
abdominal aortic aneurysms for men who are at least 65 but not
more than 75 years of age and have smoked during their lifetimes;
(g) Screening for drug and alcohol misuse for insureds who
are 18 years of age or older;
(h) If an insured engages in risky or hazardous consumption
of alcohol, as determined by the screening described in paragraph
(g), behavioral counseling to reduce such behavior;
(i) Screening for lung cancer using low-dose computed
tomography for insureds who are at least 50 but not more than 80
years of age in accordance with the most recent guidelines
published by the American Cancer Society or the
recommendations of the United States Preventive Services Task
Force in effect on January 1, 2025;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 101 –
(j) Screening for prediabetes and type 2 diabetes in insureds
who are at least 35 but not more than 70 years of age and have a
body mass index of 25 or greater; and
(k) Intensive behavioral interventions with multiple
components for insureds who are 18 years of age or older and
have a body mass index of 30 or greater.
2. A managed care organization must ensure that the benefits
required by subsection 1 are made available to an insured through
a provider of health care who participates in the network plan of
the managed care organization.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a managed
care organization that offers or issues a health care plan shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health care
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care
plan solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan
uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan or the
renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal
law, a managed care organization may use medical management
techniques, including, without limitation, any available clinical
evidence, to determine the frequency of or treatment relating to
any benefit required by this section or the type of provider of
health care to use for such treatment.
6. As used in this section:
-
*AB522_R1*

– 102 –
(a) “Computed tomography” means the process of producing
sectional and three-dimensional images using external ionizing
radiation.
(b) “Facility for the dependent” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 449.0045.
(c) “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
(d) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(e) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
managed care organization under which the financing and
delivery of medical care, including items and services paid for as
medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined
set of providers of health care under contract with the managed
care organization. The term does not include an arrangement for
the financing of premiums.
(f) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 94. 1. A managed care organization that offers or
issues a health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
shall include in the health care plan coverage for maternity care
and pediatric care for newborn infants.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a health
care plan issued pursuant to this chapter may not restrict benefits
for any length of stay in a hospital in connection with childbirth
for a pregnant or postpartum individual or newborn infant
covered by the plan to:
(a) Less than 48 hours after a normal vaginal delivery; and
(b) Less than 96 hours after a cesarean section.
 If a different length of stay is provided in the guidelines
established by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists, or its successor organization, and the American
Academy of Pediatrics, or its successor organization, the health
care plan may follow such guidelines in lieu of following the
length of stay set forth above. The provisions of this subsection do
not apply to any health care plan in any case in which the decision
to discharge the pregnant or postpartum individual or newborn
infant before the expiration of the minimum length of stay set
forth in this subsection is made by the attending physician of the
pregnant or postpartum individual or newborn infant.
3. Nothing in this section requires a pregnant or postpartum
individual to:
-
*AB522_R1*

– 103 –
(a) Deliver the baby in a hospital; or
(b) Stay in a hospital for a fixed period following the birth of
the child.
4. A health care plan may not:
(a) Deny a pregnant or postpartum individual or the newborn
infant coverage or continued coverage under the terms of the plan
if the sole purpose of the denial of coverage or continued coverage
is to avoid the requirements of this section;
(b) Provide monetary payments or rebates to a pregnant or
postpartum individual to encourage the individual to accept less
than the minimum protection available pursuant to this section;
(c) Penalize, or otherwise reduce or limit, the reimbursement
of an attending provider of health care because the attending
provider of health care provided care to a pregnant or postpartum
individual or newborn infant in accordance with the provisions of
this section;
(d) Provide incentives of any kind to an attending physician to
induce the attending physician to provide care to a pregnant or
postpartum individual or newborn infant in a manner that is
inconsistent with the provisions of this section; or
(e) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, restrict
benefits for any portion of a hospital stay required pursuant to the
provisions of this section in a manner that is less favorable than
the benefits provided for any preceding portion of that stay.
5. Nothing in this section:
(a) Prohibits a managed care organization from imposing a
deductible, coinsurance or other mechanism for sharing costs
relating to benefits for hospital stays in connection with childbirth
for a pregnant or postpartum individual or newborn child covered
by the plan, except that such coinsurance or other mechanism for
sharing costs for any portion of a hospital stay required by this
section may not be greater than the coinsurance or other
mechanism for any preceding portion of that stay.
(b) Prohibits an arrangement for payment between a managed
care organization and a provider of health care that uses
capitation or other financial incentives, if the arrangement is
designed to provide services efficiently and consistently in the best
interest of the pregnant or postpartum individual and the newborn
infant.
(c) Prevents a managed care organization from negotiating
with a provider of health care concerning the level and type of
reimbursement to be provided in accordance with this section.
6. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
October 1, 2025, has the legal effect of including the coverage
-
*AB522_R1*

– 104 –
required by this section, and any provision of the plan that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
Sec. 95. NRS 695G.168 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695G.168 1. A health care plan issued by a managed care
organization [that provides coverage for the treatment of colorectal
cancer] must provide coverage for colorectal cancer screening in
accordance with:
(a) The guidelines concerning colorectal cancer screening which
are published by the American Cancer Society; or
(b) Other guidelines or reports concerning colorectal cancer
screening which are published by nationally recognized professional
organizations and which include current or prevailing supporting
scientific data.
2. A managed care organization must ensure that the benefits
required by subsection 1 are made available to an insured through
a provider of health care who participates in the network plan of
the managed care organization.
3. A managed care organization that offers or issues a health
care plan shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health care
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care
plan solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan
uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. An evidence of coverage for a health care plan subject to the
provisions of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or
renewed on or after October 1, [2003,] 2025, has the legal effect of
including the coverage required by this section, and any provision of
the evidence of coverage that conflicts with the provisions of this
section is void.
5. As used in this section:
-
*AB522_R1*

– 105 –
(a) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
managed care organization under which the financing and
delivery of medical care, including items and services paid for as
medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined
set of providers of health care under contract with the managed
care organization. The term does not include an arrangement for
the financing of premiums.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 96. NRS 695G.1707 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.1707 1. A managed care organization that offers or
issues a health care plan shall include in the plan:
(a) Coverage of testing for, treatment of and prevention of
sexually transmitted diseases, including, without limitation,
Chlamydia trachomatis, gonorrhea, syphilis, human
immunodeficiency virus and hepatitis B and C, for all insureds,
regardless of age. Such coverage must include, without limitation,
the coverage required by NRS 695G.1705 and 695G.1714.
(b) Unrestricted coverage of condoms for insureds who are 13
years of age or older.
2. A managed care organization that offers or issues a health
care plan shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health care
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care
plan solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan
uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
3. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after [January]
October 1, [2024,] 2025, has the legal effect of including the
-
*AB522_R1*

– 106 –
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section, “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 97. NRS 695G.1712 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.1712 1. A managed care organization that issues a
health care plan shall provide coverage for screening, genetic
counseling and testing for harmful mutations in the BRCA gene for
women under circumstances where such screening, genetic
counseling or testing, as applicable, is required by NRS 457.301.
2. A managed care organization shall ensure that the benefits
required by subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a
provider of health care who participates in the network plan of the
managed care organization.
3. A managed care organization that issues a health care
plan shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health care
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care
plan solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan
uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after [January]
October 1, [2022,] 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
[4.] 5. As used in this section:
(a) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
managed care organization under which the financing and delivery
of medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
-
*AB522_R1*

– 107 –
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers under contract with the managed care organization. The
term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 98. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 99. NRS 695G.1714 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.1714 1. A managed care organization that issues a
health care plan shall provide coverage for the examination of a
person who is pregnant for the discovery of:
(a) Chlamydia trachomatis, gonorrhea, hepatitis B and hepatitis
C in accordance with NRS 442.013.
(b) Syphilis in accordance with NRS 442.010.
(c) Human immunodeficiency virus.
2. The coverage required by this section must be provided:
(a) Regardless of whether the benefits are provided to the
insured by a provider of health care, facility or medical laboratory
that participates in the network plan of the managed care
organization; and
(b) Without prior authorization.
3. A managed care organization that issues a health care
plan shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health care
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care
plan solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan
uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining
any such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or
other financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny,
reduce, withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an
insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
-
*AB522_R1*

– 108 –
[July] October 1, [2021,] 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
[4.] 5. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical laboratory” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 652.060.
(b) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
managed care organization under which the financing and delivery
of medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers under contract with the managed care organization. The
term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 100. NRS 695G.1716 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.1716 1. A managed care organization that offers or
issues a health care plan [that includes coverage for maternity care]
shall not deny, limit or seek reimbursement for maternity care
because the insured is acting as a gestational carrier.
2. If an insured acts as a gestational carrier, the child shall be
deemed to be a child of the intended parent, as defined in NRS
126.590, for purposes related to the health care plan.
3. As used in this section, “gestational carrier” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 126.580.
Sec. 101. NRS 695G.1717 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.1717 1. A managed care organization that offers or
issues a health care plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) Counseling, support and supplies for breastfeeding,
including breastfeeding equipment, counseling and education during
the antenatal, perinatal and postpartum period for not more than 1
year;
(b) Screening and counseling for interpersonal and domestic
violence for women at least annually with initial intervention
services consisting of education, strategies to reduce harm,
supportive services or a referral for any other appropriate services;
(c) Behavioral counseling concerning sexually transmitted
diseases from a provider of health care for sexually active [women]
insureds who are at increased risk for such diseases;
(d) Hormone replacement therapy;
(e) Such prenatal screenings and tests as recommended by the
American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists or its
successor organization;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 109 –
(f) Screening for blood pressure abnormalities and diabetes,
including gestational diabetes, after at least 24 weeks of gestation or
as ordered by a provider of health care;
(g) Screening for cervical cancer at such intervals as are
recommended by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists or its successor organization;
(h) Screening for depression [;] for insureds who are 12 years
of age or older;
(i) Screening for anxiety disorders;
(j) Screening and counseling for the human immunodeficiency
virus consisting of a risk assessment, annual education relating to
prevention and at least one screening for the virus during the
lifetime of the insured or as ordered by a provider of health care;
[(j) Smoking]
(k) Tobacco cessation programs , including, without limitation,
pharmacotherapy approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration, for an insured who is 18 years of age or older ;
[consisting of not more than two cessation attempts per year and
four counseling sessions per year;
(k)] (l) All vaccinations recommended by the Advisory
Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease
Control and Prevention of the United States Department of Health
and Human Services or its successor organization; and
[(l)] (m) Such well-woman preventative visits as recommended
by the Health Resources and Services Administration [,] on
January 1, 2025, which must include at least one such visit per year
beginning at 14 years of age.
2. A managed care organization must ensure that the benefits
required by subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a
provider of health care who participates in the network plan of the
managed care organization.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a managed
care organization that offers or issues a health care plan shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health care plan
pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care plan
solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan uses
or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 110 –
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after [January]
October 1, [2018,] 2025, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan or
the renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
a managed care organization may use medical management
techniques, including, without limitation, any available clinical
evidence, to determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any
benefit required by this section or the type of provider of health care
to use for such treatment.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
managed care organization under which the financing and delivery
of medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers under contract with the managed care organization. The
term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 102. NRS 695G.415 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.415 1. A managed care organization that issues a
health care plan shall not discriminate against any person with
respect to participation or coverage under the plan on the basis of an
actual or perceived [gender identity or expression.] protected
characteristic.
2. Prohibited discrimination includes, without limitation:
[1.] (a) Denying, cancelling, limiting or refusing to issue or
renew a health care plan on the basis of [the] an actual or perceived
-
*AB522_R1*

– 111 –
[gender identity or expression] protected characteristic of a person
or a family member of the person;
[2.] (b) Imposing a payment or premium that is based on [the]
an actual or perceived [gender identity or expression] protected
characteristic of an insured or a family member of the insured;
[3.] (c) Designating [the] an actual or perceived [gender
identity or expression] protected characteristic of a person or a
family member of the person as grounds to deny, cancel or limit
participation or coverage; and
[4.] (d) Denying, cancelling or limiting participation or
coverage on the basis of an actual or perceived [gender identity or
expression,] protected characteristic, including, without limitation,
by limiting or denying coverage for health care services that are:
[(a)] (1) Related to gender transition, provided that there is
coverage under the plan for the services when the services are not
related to gender transition; or
[(b)] (2) Ordinarily or exclusively available to persons of any
sex.
3. As used in this section, “protected characteristic” means:
(a) Race, color, national origin, age, physical or mental
disability, sexual orientation or gender identity or expression; or
(b) Sex, including, without limitation, sex characteristics,
intersex traits and pregnancy or related conditions.
Sec. 103. NRS 232.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.320 1. The Director:
(a) Shall appoint, with the consent of the Governor,
administrators of the divisions of the Department, who are
respectively designated as follows:
(1) The Administrator of the Aging and Disability Services
Division;
(2) The Administrator of the Division of Welfare and
Supportive Services;
(3) The Administrator of the Division of Child and Family
Services;
(4) The Administrator of the Division of Health Care
Financing and Policy; and
(5) The Administrator of the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health.
(b) Shall administer, through the divisions of the Department,
the provisions of chapters 63, 424, 425, 427A, 432A to 442,
inclusive, 446 to 450, inclusive, 458A and 656A of NRS, NRS
127.220 to 127.310, inclusive, 422.001 to 422.410, inclusive, and
sections 109 to 112, inclusive, of this act, 422.580, 432.010 to
432.133, inclusive, 432B.6201 to 432B.626, inclusive, 444.002 to
444.430, inclusive, and 445A.010 to 445A.055, inclusive, and all
-
*AB522_R1*

– 112 –
other provisions of law relating to the functions of the divisions of
the Department, but is not responsible for the clinical activities of
the Division of Public and Behavioral Health or the professional line
activities of the other divisions.
(c) Shall administer any state program for persons with
developmental disabilities established pursuant to the
Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of
2000, 42 U.S.C. §§ 15001 et seq.
(d) Shall, after considering advice from agencies of local
governments and nonprofit organizations which provide social
services, adopt a master plan for the provision of human services in
this State. The Director shall revise the plan biennially and deliver a
copy of the plan to the Governor and the Legislature at the
beginning of each regular session. The plan must:
(1) Identify and assess the plans and programs of the
Department for the provision of human services, and any
duplication of those services by federal, state and local agencies;
(2) Set forth priorities for the provision of those services;
(3) Provide for communication and the coordination of those
services among nonprofit organizations, agencies of local
government, the State and the Federal Government;
(4) Identify the sources of funding for services provided by
the Department and the allocation of that funding;
(5) Set forth sufficient information to assist the Department
in providing those services and in the planning and budgeting for the
future provision of those services; and
(6) Contain any other information necessary for the
Department to communicate effectively with the Federal
Government concerning demographic trends, formulas for the
distribution of federal money and any need for the modification of
programs administered by the Department.
(e) May, by regulation, require nonprofit organizations and state
and local governmental agencies to provide information regarding
the programs of those organizations and agencies, excluding
detailed information relating to their budgets and payrolls, which the
Director deems necessary for the performance of the duties imposed
upon him or her pursuant to this section.
(f) Has such other powers and duties as are provided by law.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director, or
the Director’s designee, is responsible for appointing and removing
subordinate officers and employees of the Department.
Sec. 104. NRS 287.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
287.010 1. The governing body of any county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
-
*AB522_R1*

– 113 –
corporation or other local governmental agency of the State of
Nevada may:
(a) Adopt and carry into effect a system of group life, accident
or health insurance, or any combination thereof, for the benefit of its
officers and employees, and the dependents of officers and
employees who elect to accept the insurance and who, where
necessary, have authorized the governing body to make deductions
from their compensation for the payment of premiums on the
insurance.
(b) Purchase group policies of life, accident or health insurance,
or any combination thereof, for the benefit of such officers and
employees, and the dependents of such officers and employees, as
have authorized the purchase, from insurance companies authorized
to transact the business of such insurance in the State of Nevada,
and, where necessary, deduct from the compensation of officers and
employees the premiums upon insurance and pay the deductions
upon the premiums.
(c) Provide group life, accident or health coverage through a
self-insurance reserve fund and, where necessary, deduct
contributions to the maintenance of the fund from the compensation
of officers and employees and pay the deductions into the fund. The
money accumulated for this purpose through deductions from the
compensation of officers and employees and contributions of the
governing body must be maintained as an internal service fund as
defined by NRS 354.543. The money must be deposited in a state or
national bank or credit union authorized to transact business in the
State of Nevada. Any independent administrator of a fund created
under this section is subject to the licensing requirements of chapter
683A of NRS, and must be a resident of this State. Any contract
with an independent administrator must be approved by the
Commissioner of Insurance as to the reasonableness of
administrative charges in relation to contributions collected and
benefits provided. The provisions of NRS 439.581 to 439.597,
inclusive, 686A.135, 687B.352, 687B.408, 687B.692, 687B.723,
687B.725, 687B.805, 689B.030 to 689B.0317, inclusive, paragraphs
(b) and (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 689B.0319, subsections 2, 4, 6
and 7 of NRS 689B.0319, 689B.033 to 689B.0369, inclusive,
689B.0375 to 689B.050, inclusive, 689B.0675, 689B.265, 689B.287
, [and] 689B.500 and 689B.520 and sections 17 to 20, inclusive, of
this act apply to coverage provided pursuant to this paragraph,
except that the provisions of NRS 689B.0314, 689B.0315,
689B.0316, 689B.0367, 689B.0378, 689B.03785 [and] , 689B.0675,
689B.500 and 689B.520 and sections 17 to 20, inclusive, of this act
only apply to coverage for active officers and employees of the
governing body, or the dependents of such officers and employees.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 114 –
(d) Defray part or all of the cost of maintenance of a self-
insurance fund or of the premiums upon insurance. The money for
contributions must be budgeted for in accordance with the laws
governing the county, school district, municipal corporation,
political subdivision, public corporation or other local governmental
agency of the State of Nevada.
2. If a school district offers group insurance to its officers and
employees pursuant to this section, members of the board of trustees
of the school district must not be excluded from participating in the
group insurance. If the amount of the deductions from compensation
required to pay for the group insurance exceeds the compensation to
which a trustee is entitled, the difference must be paid by the trustee.
3. In any county in which a legal services organization exists,
the governing body of the county, or of any school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of the State of Nevada in the
county, may enter into a contract with the legal services
organization pursuant to which the officers and employees of the
legal services organization, and the dependents of those officers and
employees, are eligible for any life, accident or health insurance
provided pursuant to this section to the officers and employees, and
the dependents of the officers and employees, of the county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency.
4. If a contract is entered into pursuant to subsection 3, the
officers and employees of the legal services organization:
(a) Shall be deemed, solely for the purposes of this section, to be
officers and employees of the county, school district, municipal
corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or other local
governmental agency with which the legal services organization has
contracted; and
(b) Must be required by the contract to pay the premiums or
contributions for all insurance which they elect to accept or of which
they authorize the purchase.
5. A contract that is entered into pursuant to subsection 3:
(a) Must be submitted to the Commissioner of Insurance for
approval not less than 30 days before the date on which the contract
is to become effective.
(b) Does not become effective unless approved by the
Commissioner.
(c) Shall be deemed to be approved if not disapproved by the
Commissioner within 30 days after its submission.
6. As used in this section, “legal services organization” means
an organization that operates a program for legal aid and receives
money pursuant to NRS 19.031.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 115 –
Sec. 105. NRS 287.0273 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
287.0273 1. The governing body of any county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency of the State of
Nevada that provides health insurance through a plan of self-
insurance shall provide coverage for benefits payable for expenses
incurred for [a] :
(a) A mammogram every 2 years, or annually if ordered by a
provider of health care, for women 40 years of age or older [.] ; and
(b) A diagnostic imaging test for breast cancer at the age
deemed most appropriate, when medically necessary, as
recommended by the insured’s provider of health care to evaluate
an abnormality which is:
(1) Seen or suspected from the mammogram described in
paragraph (a) or the imaging test described in this paragraph; or
(2) Detected by other means of examination.
2. The governing body of any county, school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of the State of Nevada that
provides health insurance through a plan of self-insurance must
ensure that the benefits required by subsection 1 are made available
to an insured through a provider of health care who participates in
the network plan of the governing body.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the governing
body of any county, school district, municipal corporation, political
subdivision, public corporation or other local governmental agency
of the State of Nevada that provides health insurance through a plan
of self-insurance shall not:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, require an
insured to pay a higher deductible, any copayment or coinsurance or
require a longer waiting period or other condition to obtain any
benefit provided in the plan of self-insurance pursuant to
subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a plan of self-insurance or cancel a plan of
self-insurance solely because the person applying for or covered by
the policy uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 116 –
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A plan of self-insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter which is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after January 1, 2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy or the
renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
the governing body of any county, school district, municipal
corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or other local
governmental agency of the State of Nevada that provides health
insurance through a plan of self-insurance may use medical
management techniques, including, without limitation, any available
clinical evidence, to determine the frequency of or treatment relating
to any benefit required by this section or the type of provider of
health care to use for such treatment.
6. If the application of paragraph (a) of subsection 3 would
result in the ineligibility of a health savings account of an insured
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223, the prohibitions of paragraph (a) of
subsection 3 shall apply only for a qualified plan of self-insurance
with respect to the deductible of such a plan of self-insurance after
the insured has satisfied the minimum deductible pursuant to 26
U.S.C. § 223, except with respect to items or services that constitute
preventive care pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223(c)(2)(C), in which case
the prohibitions of paragraph (a) of subsection 3 shall apply
regardless of whether the minimum deductible under 26 U.S.C. §
223 has been satisfied.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a plan of self-insurance provided by
the governing body of a local governmental agency under which the
financing and delivery of medical care, including items and services
paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a
defined set of providers under contract with the governing body.
The term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 117 –
(d) “Qualified plan of self-insurance” means a plan of self-
insurance that has a high deductible and is in compliance with 26
U.S.C. § 223 for the purposes of establishing a health savings
account.
Sec. 106. NRS 287.04335 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
287.04335 If the Board provides health insurance through a
plan of self-insurance, it shall comply with the provisions of NRS
439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, 686A.135, 687B.352, 687B.409,
687B.692, 687B.723, 687B.725, 687B.805, 689B.0353, 689B.255,
695C.1723, 695G.150, 695G.155, 695G.160, 695G.162,
695G.1635, 695G.164, 695G.1645, 695G.1665 [, 695G.167,
695G.1675, 695G.170] to 695G.1712, inclusive, 695G.1714 to
695G.174, inclusive, 695G.176, 695G.177, 695G.200 to 695G.230,
inclusive, 695G.241 to 695G.310, inclusive, 695G.405 and
695G.415, and sections 90 to 94, inclusive, of this act in the same
manner as an insurer that is licensed pursuant to title 57 of NRS is
required to comply with those provisions.
Sec. 107. NRS 287.04337 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
287.04337 1. If the Board provides health insurance through
a plan of self-insurance, it shall provide coverage for benefits
payable for expenses incurred for [a] :
(a) A mammogram every 2 years, or annually if ordered by a
provider of health care, for women 40 years of age or older [.] ; and
(b) A diagnostic imaging test for breast cancer at the age
deemed most appropriate, when medically necessary, as
recommended by the insured’s provider of health care to evaluate
an abnormality which is:
(1) Seen or suspected from the mammogram described in
paragraph (a) or the imaging test described in this paragraph or
(2) Detected by other means of examination.
2. If the Board provides health insurance through a plan of self-
insurance, it must ensure that the benefits required by subsection 1
are made available to an insured through a provider of health care
who participates in the network plan of the Board.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, if the Board
provides health insurance through a plan of self-insurance, it shall
not:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, require an
insured to pay a higher deductible, any copayment or coinsurance or
require a longer waiting period or other condition to obtain any
benefit provided in the plan of self-insurance pursuant to
subsection 1;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 118 –
(b) Refuse to issue a plan of self-insurance or cancel a plan of
self-insurance solely because the person applying for or covered by
the plan uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A plan of self-insurance described in subsection 1 which is
delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after January 1,
2024, has the legal effect of including the coverage required by
subsection 1, and any provision of the policy or the renewal which is
in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
if the Board provides health insurance through a plan of self-
insurance, the Board may use medical management techniques,
including, without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to
determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit
required by this section or the type of provider of health care to use
for such treatment.
6. If the application of paragraph (a) of subsection 3 would
result in the ineligibility of a health savings account of an insured
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223, the prohibitions of paragraph (a) of
subsection 3 shall apply only for a qualified plan of self-insurance
with respect to the deductible of such a plan of self-insurance after
the insured has satisfied the minimum deductible pursuant to 26
U.S.C. § 223, except with respect to items or services that constitute
preventive care pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223(c)(2)(C), in which case
the prohibitions of paragraph (a) of subsection 3 shall apply
regardless of whether the minimum deductible under 26 U.S.C. §
223 has been satisfied.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a plan of self-insurance provided by
the Board under which the financing and delivery of medical care,
-
*AB522_R1*

– 119 –
including items and services paid for as medical care, are provided,
in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract
with the Board. The term does not include an arrangement for the
financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(d) “Qualified plan of self-insurance” means a plan of self-
insurance that has a high deductible and is in compliance with 26
U.S.C. § 223 for the purposes of establishing a health savings
account.
Sec. 108. Chapter 422 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 109 to 112, inclusive, of
this act.
Sec. 109. 1. The Director shall include under Medicaid a
requirement that the State pay the nonfederal share of
expenditures incurred for:
(a) Screening for major depressive disorder for recipients of
Medicaid who are at least 12 but less than 18 years of age;
(b) Screening for anxiety for recipients of Medicaid who are at
least 8 but less than 18 years of age;
(c) Assessments relating to height, weight, body mass index
and medical history for recipients of Medicaid who are less than
18 years of age;
(d) Comprehensive and intensive behavioral interventions for
recipients of Medicaid who are at least 6 but less than 18 years of
age and have a body mass index in the 95th percentile or greater
for persons of the same age and sex;
(e) The application of fluoride varnish to the primary teeth for
recipients of Medicaid who are less than 5 years of age;
(f) Oral fluoride supplements for recipients of Medicaid who
are at least 6 months of age but less than 5 years of age whose
supply of water is deficient in fluoride;
(g) Counseling and education pertaining to the minimization
of exposure to ultraviolet radiation for recipients of Medicaid who
are less than 25 years of age and the parents or legal guardians of
recipients of Medicaid who are less than 18 years of age for the
purpose of minimizing the risk of skin cancer in those persons;
(h) Brief behavioral counseling and interventions prevent
tobacco use for recipients of Medicaid who are less than 18 years
of age; and
(i) At least one screening for the detection of amblyopia or the
risk factors of amblyopia for recipients of Medicaid who are at
least 3 but not more than 5 years of age.
2. To obtain any benefit provided under Medicaid pursuant to
subsection 1, a recipient of Medicaid must not be required to:
-
*AB522_R1*

– 120 –
(a) Pay a higher deductible or any copayment or coinsurance;
or
(b) Be subject to a longer waiting period or any other
condition.
3. The Department shall:
(a) Apply to the Secretary of Health and Human Services for
any waiver of federal law or apply for any amendment of the State
Plan for Medicaid that is necessary for the Department to receive
federal funding to provide the coverage described in subsection 1.
(b) Fully cooperate with the Federal Government during the
application process to satisfy the requirements of the Federal
Government for obtaining a waiver or amendment pursuant to
paragraph (a).
Sec. 110. 1. The Director shall include under Medicaid a
requirement that the State pay the nonfederal share of
expenditures incurred for:
(a) A daily dose of 0.4 to 0.8 milligrams of folic acid for
recipients of Medicaid who are pregnant or are planning on
becoming pregnant;
(b) A low dose of aspirin for the prevention of preeclampsia
for recipients of Medicaid who are determined to be at a high risk
of that condition after 12 weeks of gestation;
(c) Prophylactic ocular tubal medication for the prevention of
gonococcal ophthalmia in newborns;
(d) Screening for asymptomatic bacteriuria for recipients of
Medicaid who are pregnant;
(e) Counseling and behavioral interventions relating to the
promotion of healthy weight gain and the prevention of excessive
weight gain for recipients of Medicaid who are pregnant;
(f) Counseling for recipients of Medicaid who are pregnant or
in the postpartum stage of pregnancy and have an increased risk
of perinatal or postpartum depression;
(g) Screening for the presence of the rhesus D antigen and
antibodies in the blood of a recipient of Medicaid who is pregnant
during the recipient’s first visit for care relating to the pregnancy;
(h) Screening for rhesus D antibodies between 24 and 28
weeks of gestation for recipients of Medicaid who are negative for
the rhesus D antigen and have not been exposed to blood that is
positive for the rhesus D antigen;
(i) Behavioral counseling and intervention for tobacco
cessation for recipients of Medicaid who are pregnant;
(j) Screening for diabetes after at least 24 weeks of gestation or
as ordered by a provider of health care;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 121 –
(k) Counseling relating to maintaining a healthy weight for
women who are at least 40 but not more than 60 years of age and
have a body mass index of 18.5 or greater; and
(l) Screening for osteoporosis for women who:
(1) Are 65 years of age or older; or
(2) Are less than 65 years of age and have a risk of
fracturing a bone equal to or greater than that of a woman who is
65 years of age without any additional risk factors.
2. To obtain any benefit provided under Medicaid pursuant to
subsection 1, a recipient of Medicaid must not be required to:
(a) Pay a higher deductible or any copayment or coinsurance;
or
(b) Be subject to a longer waiting period or any other
condition.
3. The Department shall:
(a) Apply to the Secretary of Health and Human Services for
any waiver of federal law or apply for any amendment of the State
Plan for Medicaid that is necessary for the Department to receive
federal funding to provide the coverage described in subsection 1.
(b) Fully cooperate with the Federal Government during the
application process to satisfy the requirements of the Federal
Government for obtaining a waiver or amendment pursuant to
paragraph (a).
Sec. 111. 1. The Director shall include under Medicaid a
requirement that the State pay the nonfederal share of
expenditures incurred for:
(a) Behavioral counseling and interventions to promote
physical activity and a heathy diet for recipients of Medicaid with
cardiovascular risk factors;
(b) Statin preventive medication for recipients of Medicaid
who are at least 40 but not more than 75 years of age and do not
have a history of cardiovascular disease, but who have:
(1) One or more risk factors for cardiovascular disease;
and
(2) A calculated risk of at least 10 percent of acquiring
cardiovascular disease within the next 10 years;
(c) Interventions for exercise to prevent falls for recipients of
Medicaid who are 65 years of age or older and reside in a medical
facility or facility for the dependent;
(d) Screenings for latent tuberculosis infection in recipients of
Medicaid with an increased risk of contracting tuberculosis;
(e) One abdominal aortic screening by ultrasound to detect
abdominal aortic aneurysms for men who are at least 65 but not
more than 75 years of age and have smoked during their lifetimes;
-
*AB522_R1*

– 122 –
(f) Screening for drug and alcohol misuse for persons who are
at least 18 years of age;
(g) If a recipient of Medicaid engages in risky or hazardous
consumption of alcohol, as determined by the screening described
in paragraph (f), behavioral counseling to reduce such behavior;
(h) Screening for lung cancer using low-dose computed
tomography for recipients of Medicaid who are at least 50 but not
more than 80 years of age in accordance with the most recent
guidelines published by the American Cancer Society or the
recommendations of the United States Preventive Services Task
Force in effect on January 1, 2025;
(i) Screening for colorectal cancer for persons who are at least
45 but not more than 85 years of age; and
(j) Intensive behavioral interventions with multiple
components for recipients of Medicaid who are 18 years of age or
older and have a body mass index of 30 or greater.
2. To obtain any benefit provided under Medicaid pursuant to
subsection 1, a recipient of Medicaid must not be required to:
(a) Pay a higher deductible or any copayment or coinsurance;
or
(b) Be subject to a longer waiting period or any other
condition.
3. The Department shall:
(a) Apply to the Secretary of Health and Human Services for
any waiver of federal law or apply for any amendment of the State
Plan for Medicaid that is necessary for the Department to receive
federal funding to provide the coverage described in subsection 1.
(b) Fully cooperate with the Federal Government during the
application process to satisfy the requirements of the Federal
Government for obtaining a waiver or amendment pursuant to
paragraph (a).
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Computed tomography” means the process of producing
sectional and three-dimensional images using external ionizing
radiation.
(b) “Facility for the dependent” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 449.0045.
(c) “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
Sec. 112. 1. To the extent that federal financial
participation is available, the Director shall include under
Medicaid coverage for maternity care and pediatric care for
newborn infants.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, Medicaid
may not restrict benefits for any length of stay in a hospital in
-
*AB522_R1*

– 123 –
connection with childbirth for a pregnant or postpartum
individual or newborn infant who is a recipient of Medicaid to:
(a) Less than 48 hours after a normal vaginal delivery; and
(b) Less than 96 hours after a cesarean section.
 If a different length of stay is provided in the guidelines
established by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists, or its successor organization, and the American
Academy of Pediatrics, or its successor organization, Medicaid
may follow such guidelines in lieu of following the length of stay
set forth above. The provisions of this subsection do not apply in
any case in which the decision to discharge the pregnant or
postpartum individual or newborn infant before the expiration of
the minimum length of stay set forth in this subsection is made by
the attending physician of the pregnant or postpartum individual
or newborn infant.
3. Nothing in this section requires a pregnant or postpartum
individual to:
(a) Deliver the baby in a hospital; or
(b) Stay in a hospital for a fixed period following the birth of
the child.
4. Nothing in this section:
(a) Prohibits Medicaid from imposing a deductible,
coinsurance or other mechanism for sharing costs relating to
benefits for hospital stays in connection with childbirth for a
pregnant or postpartum individual or newborn child who is a
recipient of Medicaid, except that such coinsurance or other
mechanism for sharing costs for any portion of a hospital stay
required by this section may not be greater than the coinsurance
or other mechanism for any preceding portion of that stay.
(b) Prohibits an arrangement for payment between the
Department and a provider of health care that uses capitation or
other financial incentives, if the arrangement is designed to
provide services efficiently and consistently in the best interest of
the pregnant or postpartum individual and the newborn infant.
(c) Prevents the Department from negotiating with a provider
of health care concerning the level and type of reimbursement to
be provided in accordance with this section.
Sec. 113. NRS 422.2701 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
422.2701 1. The Department shall not discriminate against
any person with respect to participation or coverage under Medicaid
on the basis of an actual or perceived [gender identity or
expression.] protected characteristic.
2. Prohibited discrimination includes, without limitation:
-
*AB522_R1*

– 124 –
[1.] (a) Denying, cancelling, limiting or refusing to issue a
payment or coverage on the basis of [the] an actual or perceived
[gender identity or expression] protected characteristic of a person
or a family member of the person;
[2.] (b) Imposing a payment that is based on [the] an actual or
perceived [gender identity or expression] protected characteristic of
a recipient of Medicaid or a family member of the recipient;
[3.] (c) Designating [the] an actual or perceived [gender
identity or expression] protected characteristic of a person or a
family member of the person as grounds to deny, cancel or limit
participation or coverage; and
[4.] (d) Denying, cancelling or limiting participation or
coverage on the basis of an actual or perceived [gender identity or
expression,] protected characteristic, including, without limitation,
by limiting or denying payment or coverage for health care services
that are:
[(a)] (1) Related to gender transition, provided that there is
coverage under Medicaid for the services when the services are not
related to gender transition; or
[(b)] (2) Ordinarily or exclusively available to persons of any
sex.
3. As used in this section, “protected characteristic” means:
(a) Race, color, national origin, age, physical or mental
disability, sexual orientation or gender identity or expression; or
(b) Sex, including, without limitation, sex characteristics,
intersex traits and pregnancy or related conditions.
Sec. 114. NRS 422.27173 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
422.27173 1. The Director shall include in the State Plan for
Medicaid a requirement that the State must pay the nonfederal share
of expenditures incurred for:
[1.] (a) Testing for and the treatment and prevention of sexually
transmitted diseases, including, without limitation, Chlamydia
trachomatis, gonorrhea, syphilis, human immunodeficiency virus
and hepatitis B and C, for all recipients of Medicaid, regardless of
age. Services covered pursuant to this section must include, without
limitation, the examination of a pregnant woman for the discovery
of:
[(a)] (1) Chlamydia trachomatis, gonorrhea, hepatitis B and
hepatitis C in accordance with NRS 442.013.
[(b)] (2) Syphilis in accordance with NRS 442.010.
[2.] (3) Human immunodeficiency virus.
(b) Condoms for recipients of Medicaid.
2. To obtain any benefit provided pursuant to subsection 1, a
recipient of Medicaid must not be required to:
-
*AB522_R1*

– 125 –
(a) Pay a higher deductible or any copayment or coinsurance;
or
(b) Be subject to a longer waiting period or any other
condition.
Sec. 115. NRS 422.27174 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
422.27174 1. The Director shall include in the State Plan for
Medicaid a requirement that the State pay the nonfederal share of
expenditures incurred for:
(a) Counseling and support for breastfeeding;
(b) Screening and counseling for interpersonal and domestic
violence;
(c) Counseling for sexually transmitted diseases;
(d) Screening for blood pressure abnormalities and diabetes,
including gestational diabetes;
(e) Screening for prediabetes in recipients of Medicaid who
are at least 35 but not more than 70 years of age and have a body
mass index of 25 or greater;
(f) An annual screening for cervical cancer;
[(f)] (g) Screening for anxiety and depression;
[(g)] (h) Screening and counseling for the human
immunodeficiency virus;
[(h)] (i) Smoking cessation programs;
[(i)] (j) All vaccinations recommended by the Advisory
Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease
Control and Prevention of the United States Department of Health
and Human Services or its successor organization; and
[(j)] (k) Such well-woman preventative visits as recommended
by the Health Resources and Services Administration [.] on
January 1, 2025, and any additional well-woman preventative
visits that may be so recommended thereafter.
2. To obtain any benefit provided in the Plan pursuant to
subsection 1, a recipient of Medicaid must not be required to:
(a) Pay a higher deductible [,] or any copayment or coinsurance;
or
(b) Be subject to a longer waiting period or any other condition.
Sec. 116. NRS 422.27175 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
422.27175 1. The Director shall include in the State Plan for
Medicaid a requirement that the State, to the extent authorized by
federal law, must pay the nonfederal share of expenditures incurred
for screening, genetic counseling and testing for harmful mutations
in the BRCA gene for women under circumstances where such
screening, genetic counseling or testing, as applicable, is required by
NRS 457.301.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 126 –
2. To obtain any benefit provided pursuant to subsection 1, a
recipient of Medicaid must not be required to:
(a) Pay a higher deductible or any copayment or coinsurance;
or
(b) Be subject to a longer waiting period or any other
condition.
Sec. 117. NRS 422.27176 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
422.27176 1. The Director shall include in the State Plan for
Medicaid a requirement that the State pay the nonfederal share of
expenditures incurred for a mammogram.
2. To obtain any benefit provided pursuant to subsection 1, a
recipient of Medicaid must not be required to:
(a) Pay a higher deductible or any copayment or coinsurance;
or
(b) Be subject to a longer waiting period or any other
condition.
Sec. 118. NRS 422.27179 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
422.27179 1. To the extent that money is available, the
Director shall include in the State Plan for Medicaid a requirement
that the State pay the nonfederal share of expenditures incurred for:
(a) Supplies for breastfeeding a child until the child’s first
birthday. Such supplies include, without limitation, electric or
hospital-grade breast pumps that:
(1) Have been prescribed or ordered by a qualified provider
of health care; and
(2) Are medically necessary for the mother or the child.
(b) Such prenatal screenings and tests as are recommended by
the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, or its
successor organization.
2. The Director shall include in the State Plan for Medicaid a
requirement that, to the extent that money and federal financial
participation are available, the State must pay the nonfederal share
of expenditures incurred for lactation consultation and support.
3. To obtain any benefit provided pursuant to subsection 1, a
recipient of Medicaid must not be required to:
(a) Pay a higher deductible or any copayment or coinsurance;
or
(b) Be subject to a longer waiting period or any other
condition.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Medically necessary” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 695G.055.
-
*AB522_R1*

– 127 –
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 119. Chapter 629 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A provider of health care shall not discriminate in the
provision of services to a person seeking to receive or receiving
services from the provider of health care based wholly or partially
on the actual or perceived:
(a) Race, color, national origin, age, physical or mental
disability, sexual orientation or gender identity or expression of
the person or a person with whom the person associates; or
(b) Sex, including, without limitation, sex characteristics,
intersex traits and pregnancy or related conditions.
2. A health care licensing board may adopt regulations
prescribing the specific types of discrimination prohibited by
subsection 1.
3. A provider of health care who violates any provision of this
section or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto is guilty of
unprofessional conduct and is subject to disciplinary action by the
health care licensing board by which he or she is licensed,
certified or regulated.
4. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to:
(a) Require a provider of health care to take or refrain from
taking any action in violation of medical standards; or
(b) Prohibit a provider of health care from adopting a policy
that is applied uniformly and in a nondiscriminatory manner.
5. As used in this section, “health care licensing board”
means a board created pursuant to chapter 630, 630A, 631, 632,
633, 634, 634A, 634B, 636, 637, 637B, 639, 640, 640A, 640B,
640C, 640D, 640E, 641, 641A, 641B, 641C or 641D of NRS.
Sec. 120. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 121. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage
and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 120, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB522_R1*